New York, session 2025-2026, S3001.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The several amounts named in this section or so much there- 2 of as shall be sufficient to accomplish the purposes designated by the 3 appropriations, are hereby appropriated and authorized to be paid as 4 hereinafter provided, to the respective public officers and for the 5 fiscal year beginning April 1, 2025. 6 GENERAL FUND / STATE OPERATIONS 7 STATE PURPOSES ACCOUNT 8 THE LEGISLATURE 9 OFFICE OF THE LIEUTENANT GOVERNOR 10 ADMINISTRATION PROGRAM ......................................... 351,329 11 -------------- EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD12551-02-5 2 12551-02-5 LEGISLATURE AND JUDICIARY 2025-26 1 PERSONAL SERVICE 2 Personal service-regular ......................... 336,694 3 -------------- 4 Amount available for personal service .......... 336,694 5 -------------- 6 For personal service of employees. 7 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 8 Supplies and materials ............................ 14,635 9 -------------- 10 Amount available for nonpersonal service ........ 14,635 11 -------------- 12 THE SENATE 13 For services and expenses of the Senate (including liabil- 14 ities incurred prior to April 1, 2025), including travel 15 outside the state, in accordance with the following 16 schedule ................................................. 123,970,946 17 ============== 18 SCHEDULE 19 PERSONAL SERVICE 20 For payment of salaries to Members, 63, 21 pursuant to section 5 of the legislative 22 law .......................................... 8,946,000 23 For payment of allowances to members desig- 24 nated by the temporary president, pursuant 25 to the schedule of such allowances set 26 forth in section 5-a of the legislative 27 law .......................................... 1,289,500 28 For personal service of employees and for 29 temporary and expert services of members' 30 offices and of standing committees: 31 Personal service-regular ...................... 44,476,284 32 For personal service of employees and for 33 temporary and expert services for senate 34 operations: 35 Personal service-regular ...................... 42,612,932 36 For personal service of employees and for 37 temporary and expert services for the 38 senate student program office: 39 Personal service-regular ......................... 410,556 40 Temporary service .............................. 1,134,716 41 -------------- 42 Amount available for personal service ..... 98,869,988 43 -------------- 3 12551-02-5 LEGISLATURE AND JUDICIARY 2025-26 1 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 2 Supplies and materials ......................... 6,365,595 3 Travel ......................................... 1,554,141 4 Micellaneous contractual services, includ- 5 ing, but not limited to, childcare 6 expenses incurred by members of the New 7 York State Senate in the execution of 8 their duties of public office ............... 14,557,989 9 Equipment ...................................... 2,623,233 10 -------------- 11 Amount available for nonpersonal service .. 25,100,958 12 -------------- 13 THE ASSEMBLY 14 For services and expenses (including liabilities incurred 15 prior to April 1, 2025), including travel outside the 16 state, in accordance with the following schedule ......... 144,018,232 17 ============== 18 SCHEDULE 19 PERSONAL SERVICE 20 Members, 150, payment of salaries pursuant 21 to section 5 of the legislative law ......... 21,300,000 22 For payment of allowances to members desig- 23 nated by the speaker pursuant to the 24 provisions of section 5-a of the legisla- 25 tive law ..................................... 1,592,500 26 For personal service of employees and for 27 temporary and expert services of members' 28 offices and of standing committees and 29 subcommittees: 30 Personal service-regular ...................... 35,500,000 31 Temporary service .............................. 2,500,000 32 For personal service of employees and for 33 temporary and expert services for adminis- 34 trative and program support operations: 35 Personal service-regular ...................... 43,300,732 36 Temporary service ................................ 500,000 37 For the Assembly Intern and Youth Partic- 38 ipation Program for personal service of 39 employees and for temporary and expert 40 services: 41 Personal service-regular ......................... 425,000 42 Temporary service .............................. 1,400,000 43 -------------- 44 Amount available for personal service ...... 106,518,232 45 -------------- 4 12551-02-5 LEGISLATURE AND JUDICIARY 2025-26 1 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 2 Supplies and materials ......................... 4,000,000 3 Travel ......................................... 3,500,000 4 Miscellaneous contractual services ............ 25,000,000 5 Equipment ...................................... 5,000,000 6 -------------- 7 Amount available for nonpersonal service .... 37,500,000 8 -------------- 9 ASSEMBLY WAYS AND MEANS COMMITTEE 10 For services and expenses (including liabilities incurred 11 prior to April 1, 2025), including travel outside the 12 state, in accordance with the following schedule ........... 7,494,878 13 ============== 14 PERSONAL SERVICE 15 Personal service-regular ....................... 6,809,878 16 Temporary service ................................ 120,000 17 -------------- 18 Amount available for personal service ........ 6,929,878 19 -------------- 20 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 21 Supplies and materials ........................... 350,000 22 Travel ............................................. 5,000 23 Contractual services ............................. 200,000 24 Equipment ......................................... 10,000 25 -------------- 26 Amount available for nonpersonal service ....... 565,000 27 -------------- 28 SENATE AND ASSEMBLY JOINT ENTITIES 29 LEGISLATIVE ETHICS COMMISSION 30 For services and expenses of the Legislative Ethics 31 Commission (including liabilities incurred prior to 32 April 1, 2025) pursuant to section 80 of the legislative 33 law in accordance with the following schedule ................ 484,711 34 ============== 35 PERSONAL SERVICE 36 Personal service-regular ......................... 466,544 37 -------------- 38 Amount available for personal service .......... 466,544 39 -------------- 5 12551-02-5 LEGISLATURE AND JUDICIARY 2025-26 1 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 2 Supplies and materials ............................. 1,667 3 Travel ............................................ 15,000 4 Contractual services ............................... 1,000 5 Equipment ............................................ 500 6 -------------- 7 Amount available for nonpersonal service ........ 18,167 8 -------------- 9 NATIONAL CONFERENCE OF STATE LEGISLATURES 10 For a contribution to the National Conference of State 11 Legislatures in accordance with the following schedule ....... 477,743 12 ============== 13 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 14 Contractual services ............................. 477,743 15 -------------- 16 Amount available for nonpersonal service ....... 477,743 17 -------------- 18 LEGISLATIVE HEALTH SERVICE 19 For services and expenses for the operation of the legis- 20 lative health service (including liabilities incurred 21 prior to April 1, 2025) in accordance with the following 22 schedule ..................................................... 270,263 23 ============== 24 PERSONAL SERVICE 25 Personal service-regular ......................... 242,563 26 -------------- 27 Amount available for personal service .......... 242,563 28 -------------- 29 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 30 Supplies and materials ............................ 25,700 31 Contractual services ............................... 1,000 32 Equipment .......................................... 1,000 33 -------------- 34 Amount available for nonpersonal service ........ 27,700 35 -------------- 36 LEGISLATIVE LIBRARY 37 For services and expenses for the operation of the legis- 38 lative library (including liabilities incurred prior to 39 April 1, 2025) in accordance with the following schedule 40 ............................................................ 1,021,128 41 ============== 6 12551-02-5 LEGISLATURE AND JUDICIARY 2025-26 1 PERSONAL SERVICE 2 Personal service-regular ......................... 642,128 3 -------------- 4 Amount available for personal service .......... 642,128 5 -------------- 6 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 7 Supplies and materials ........................... 100,000 8 Contractual services ............................. 274,000 9 Equipment .......................................... 5,000 10 -------------- 11 Amount available for nonpersonal service ....... 379,000 12 -------------- 13 LEGISLATIVE MESSENGER SERVICE 14 For services and expenses for the operation of the legis- 15 lative messenger service (including liabilities incurred 16 prior to April 1, 2025) in accordance with the following 17 schedule ................................................... 1,161,345 18 ============== 19 PERSONAL SERVICE 20 Personal service-regular ....................... 1,159,345 21 -------------- 22 Amount available for personal service ........ 1,159,345 23 -------------- 24 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 25 Supplies and materials ............................. 2,000 26 -------------- 27 Amount available for nonpersonal service ......... 2,000 28 -------------- 29 LEGISLATIVE BILL DRAFTING COMMISSION 30 For services and expenses, temporary and special services, 31 and for expenses of maintenance and operation, including 32 travel outside of the state, in accordance with the 33 following schedule ........................................ 19,856,029 34 ============== 35 PERSONAL SERVICE 36 Personal service-regular ...................... 14,435,235 37 Temporary service ................................ 169,240 38 -------------- 39 Amount available for personal service ....... 14,604,475 40 -------------- 7 12551-02-5 LEGISLATURE AND JUDICIARY 2025-26 1 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 2 Supplies and materials ........................... 332,021 3 Travel ............................................ 50,577 4 Contractual services ........................... 4,710,163 5 Equipment ........................................ 158,793 6 -------------- 7 Amount available for nonpersonal service ..... 5,251,554 8 -------------- 9 LEGISLATIVE TASK FORCE ON DEMOGRAPHIC RESEARCH AND REAPPORTIONMENT 10 For services and expenses (including liabilities 11 incurred prior to April 1, 2025) of the task force for 12 senate purposes in accordance with the following sche- 13 dule ....................................................... 458,389 14 -------------- 15 PERSONAL SERVICE 16 Personal service-regular ......................... 447,987 17 -------------- 18 Amount available for personal service .......... 447,987 19 -------------- 20 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 21 Travel ............................................. 3,000 22 Contractual services ............................... 7,402 23 -------------- 24 Amount available for nonpersonal service ........ 10,402 25 -------------- 26 For services and expenses (including liabilities incurred 27 prior to April 1, 2025) of the task force for assembly 28 purposes in accordance with the following schedule ........... 454,003 29 -------------- 30 PERSONAL SERVICE 31 Personal service-regular ......................... 442,803 32 -------------- 33 Amount available for personal service .......... 442,803 34 -------------- 35 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 36 Supplies and materials ............................. 1,000 37 Travel ............................................. 1,000 38 Contractual services ............................... 7,200 39 Equipment .......................................... 2,000 40 -------------- 8 12551-02-5 LEGISLATURE AND JUDICIARY 2025-26 1 Amount available for nonpersonal service ........ 11,200 2 -------------- 3 For services and expenses (including liabilities incurred 4 prior to April 1, 2025) of the task force for joint 5 operations in accordance with the following schedule ....... 1,447,073 6 -------------- 7 PERSONAL SERVICE 8 Personal service-regular ....................... 1,111,073 9 -------------- 10 Amount available for personal service ........ 1,111,073 11 -------------- 12 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 13 Supplies and materials ............................ 17,000 14 Travel ............................................. 5,000 15 Contractual services ............................. 106,000 16 Equipment ........................................ 208,000 17 -------------- 18 Amount available for nonpersonal service ....... 336,000 19 -------------- 20 INDEPENDENT REDISTRICTING COMMISSION 21 For services and expenses (including liabilities incurred 22 prior to April 1, 2025) of the Independent Redistricting 23 Commission pursuant to section 5-b of article 3 of the 24 constitution. Notwithstanding any other provision of law 25 to the contrary and within the amount made available 26 therefore by appropriation, the chair and vice-chair of 27 the Independent Redistricting Commission may receive up 28 to a state fiscal year salary of ten thousand dollars 29 and five thousand dollars for all other members of the 30 the Independent Redistricting Commission. The Independ- 31 ent Redistricting Commission shall, upon an affirmative 32 vote of the members of the commission, determine its 33 expenditures and shall make public the expenditure of 34 the funds appropriated to the Commission that it deter- 35 mines to make. Notwithstanding any other provision of 36 law to the contrary, the members, officers, and employ- 37 ees of the Independent Redistricting Commission shall be 38 deemed employees for the purposes of Section 17 and 39 Section 19 of the Public Officers Law. Notwithstanding 40 any other provision of law to the contrary, the members, 41 officers, and employees of the Independent Redistricting 42 Commission shall be deemed "legislative employees" 43 pursuant to section 73-a of the Public Officers Law of 44 the legislative law in accordance with the following 45 schedule ................................................... 1,130,000 46 -------------- 9 12551-02-5 LEGISLATURE AND JUDICIARY 2025-26 1 PERSONAL SERVICE 2 Personal service-regular ......................... 600,000 3 -------------- 4 Amount available for personal service .......... 600,000 5 -------------- 6 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 7 Supplies and materials ............................ 10,000 8 Travel ............................................ 10,000 9 Contractual services ............................. 500,000 10 Equipment ......................................... 10,000 11 -------------- 12 Amount available for nonpersonal service ....... 530,000 13 -------------- 14 SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS -- OTHER 15 LEGISLATIVE COMPUTER SERVICES FUND 16 For services and expenses of the Legislative Computer 17 Services Fund in accordance with the following schedule .... 1,500,000 18 -------------- 19 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 20 Contractual services ........................... 1,000,000 21 Equipment ........................................ 500,000 22 -------------- 23 Amount available for nonpersonal service ..... 1,500,000 24 -------------- 25 SENATE RECYCLABLE MATERIALS, 26 INFORMATION SERVICES AND CONFERENCE FUND 27 For services and expenses of the Senate Recyclable Materi- 28 als, Information Services and Conference Fund in accord- 29 ance with the following schedule .............................. 50,000 30 -------------- 31 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 32 Supplies and materials ............................ 50,000 33 -------------- 34 Amount available for nonpersonal service ........ 50,000 35 -------------- 36 ASSEMBLY RECYCLABLE MATERIALS, 37 INFORMATION SERVICES AND CONFERENCE FUND 38 For services and expenses of the Assembly Recyclable Mate- 39 rials, Information Services and Conference Fund in 40 accordance with the following schedule ........................ 50,000 41 -------------- 10 12551-02-5 LEGISLATURE AND JUDICIARY 2025-26 1 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 2 Supplies and materials ............................ 50,000 3 -------------- 4 Amount available for nonpersonal service ........ 50,000 5 -------------- 6 GRANTS AND BEQUESTS FUND 7 LEGISLATURE 8 THE SENATE 9 For services and expenses relative to restoration of the 10 Senate Chamber and other purposes as funded by non-state 11 grants in accordance with the following schedule ............. 250,000 12 -------------- 13 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 14 Contractual services ............................. 250,000 15 -------------- 16 Amount available for nonpersonal service ....... 250,000 17 -------------- 18 THE ASSEMBLY 19 For services and expenses relative to restoration of the 20 Assembly Chamber and other purposes as funded by non- 21 state grants in accordance with the following schedule ....... 250,000 22 -------------- 23 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 24 Contractual services ............................. 250,000 25 -------------- 26 Amount available for nonpersonal service ....... 250,000 27 -------------- 11 12551-02-5 LEGISLATURE AND JUDICIARY 2025-26 1 THE JUDICIARY 2 § 2. The several amounts named in this section, or so much thereof as 3 shall be sufficient to accomplish the purposes designated by the appro- 4 priations, are hereby appropriated and authorized to be paid as herein- 5 after provided, to the respective public officers and for the several 6 purposes specified, which amounts shall be available for the fiscal year 7 beginning April 1, 2025. 8 Notwithstanding any other provision of law, all moneys paid into the 9 state treasury pursuant to subdivision 1 of section 465 of the judiciary 10 law shall thereupon be transferred to the attorney licensing fund. 11 Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the unified court system 12 may enter into one or more contracts with the center for justice inno- 13 vation for services in relation to various judiciary programs and, with 14 the approval of the chief administrator of the courts filed with the 15 comptroller, may expend up to $15 million of the funds provided by this 16 section for such services pursuant to such contract or contracts. 17 For services and expenses including travel outside the 18 state and the payment of liabilities incurred prior to 19 April 1, 2025 in accordance with the following schedule: 20 STATE OPERATIONS 2025-26 21 APPROPRIATIONS REAPPROPRIATIONS 22 General Fund - State and Local ..... 2,501,786,000 33,036,000 23 Special Revenue Funds - Federal .... 19,000,000 41,800,000 24 Special Revenue Funds - Other ...... 151,010,000 17,116,000 25 ---------------- ---------------- 26 All Funds ........................ 2,671,796,000 91,952,000 27 ================ ================ 28 SCHEDULE 29 Notwithstanding any provision of law, the amount appropri- 30 ated for any program or fund within a major purpose 31 within this schedule may be increased or decreased in 32 any amount by interchange with any other program or fund 33 in any other major purpose, or with any appropriation in 34 section three of this act, with the approval of the 35 chief administrator of the courts. 36 COURTS OF ORIGINAL JURISDICTION .......................... 2,226,791,000 37 -------------- 38 General Fund / State Operations 39 State Purposes Account 12 12551-02-5 LEGISLATURE AND JUDICIARY 2025-26 1 PERSONAL SERVICE 2 Personal service - regular ................. 1,843,234,000 3 Personal service - temporary ................... 4,692,000 4 Personal service - holiday / overtime 5 compensation ................................ 55,835,000 6 -------------- 7 Amount available for personal service .... 1,903,761,000 8 -------------- 9 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 10 Supplies and Materials ........................ 17,863,000 11 Travel ......................................... 4,156,000 12 Contractual Services ......................... 205,398,000 13 Equipment ...................................... 2,500,000 14 -------------- 15 Amount available for nonpersonal service ... 229,917,000 16 -------------- 17 Program account subtotal ............... 2,133,678,000 18 -------------- 19 Special Revenue Funds - Other / State Operations 20 New York City County Clerks' Operations Offset Fund 21 For services and expenses as provided by 22 section 94-a of the state finance law. 23 PERSONAL SERVICE 24 Personal service - regular .................... 25,468,000 25 Personal service - holiday/overtime compen- 26 sation ........................................... 1,000 27 -------------- 28 Amount available for personal service ....... 25,469,000 29 -------------- 30 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 31 Supplies and Materials ........................... 172,000 32 Travel ............................................. 9,000 33 Contractual Services ............................. 923,000 34 -------------- 35 Amount available for nonpersonal service ..... 1,104,000 36 -------------- 37 Program fund subtotal ..................... 26,573,000 38 -------------- 39 Special Revenue Funds - Other / State Operations 40 Judiciary Data Processing Offset Fund 41 For services and expenses as provided by 42 section 94-b of the state finance law. 13 12551-02-5 LEGISLATURE AND JUDICIARY 2025-26 1 PERSONAL SERVICE 2 Personal service - regular .................... 41,888,000 3 Personal service - holiday / overtime 4 compensation ................................... 220,000 5 -------------- 6 Amount available for personal service ....... 42,108,000 7 -------------- 8 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 9 Travel ........................................... 165,000 10 -------------- 11 Amount available for nonpersonal service ....... 165,000 12 -------------- 13 Program fund subtotal ..................... 42,273,000 14 -------------- 15 Special Revenue Funds - Other / State Operations 16 Court Facilities Incentive Aid Fund 17 PERSONAL SERVICE 18 Personal service - regular ....................... 469,000 19 -------------- 20 Amount available for personal service .......... 469,000 21 -------------- 22 Program fund subtotal ........................ 469,000 23 -------------- 24 Special Revenue Funds - Federal / State Operations 25 Federal Operating Grants Fund 26 Federal Miscellaneous Grants (Operating) Account 27 MAINTENANCE UNDISTRIBUTED 28 For services and expenses including travel 29 outside the state and the payment of 30 liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 31 2025 ......................................... 9,500,000 32 -------------- 33 Program account subtotal ................... 9,500,000 34 -------------- 35 Special Revenue Funds - Federal / State Operations 36 Federal Grants - Health and Human Services 37 MAINTENANCE UNDISTRIBUTED 38 For services and expenses including travel 39 outside the state and the payment of lia- 40 bilities incurred prior to April 1, 2025 ..... 9,500,000 41 -------------- 14 12551-02-5 LEGISLATURE AND JUDICIARY 2025-26 1 Program account subtotal ................... 9,500,000 2 -------------- 3 Special Revenue Funds - Other / State Operations 4 Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund 5 PERSONAL SERVICE 6 Personal service - regular ..................... 1,565,000 7 -------------- 8 Amount available for personal service ........ 1,565,000 9 -------------- 10 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 11 Supplies and Materials ............................. 4,000 12 Travel ............................................. 1,000 13 Contractual Services ........................... 2,978,000 14 -------------- 15 Amount available for nonpersonal service ..... 2,983,000 16 -------------- 17 Program fund subtotal ...................... 4,548,000 18 -------------- 19 Special Revenue Funds - Other / Asset Forfeiture 20 Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund 21 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 22 Supplies and Materials ............................ 10,000 23 Contractual Services ............................. 120,000 24 Equipment ........................................ 120,000 25 -------------- 26 Amount available for nonpersonal service ....... 250,000 27 -------------- 28 Program fund subtotal ........................ 250,000 29 -------------- 30 COURT OF APPEALS ............................................ 18,088,000 31 -------------- 32 General Fund / State Operations 33 State Purposes Account 34 PERSONAL SERVICE 35 Personal service - regular .................... 16,727,000 36 Personal service - holiday / overtime 37 compensation ................................... 156,000 38 -------------- 39 Amount available for personal service ....... 16,883,000 40 -------------- 15 12551-02-5 LEGISLATURE AND JUDICIARY 2025-26 1 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 2 Supplies and Materials ........................... 394,000 3 Travel ........................................... 393,000 4 Contractual Services ............................. 418,000 5 -------------- 6 Amount available for nonpersonal service ..... 1,205,000 7 -------------- 8 Program account subtotal .................. 18,088,000 9 -------------- 10 APPELLATE COURT OPERATIONS ................................. 109,302,000 11 -------------- 12 General Fund / State Operations 13 State Purposes Account 14 PERSONAL SERVICE 15 Personal service - regular ................... 104,686,000 16 Personal service - temporary ................... 1,945,000 17 Personal service - holiday / overtime 18 compensation ................................... 218,000 19 -------------- 20 Amount available for personal service ...... 106,849,000 21 -------------- 22 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 23 Supplies and Materials ......................... 1,206,000 24 Travel ........................................... 323,000 25 Contractual Services ............................. 924,000 26 -------------- 27 Amount available for nonpersonal service ..... 2,453,000 28 -------------- 29 Program account subtotal ................. 109,302,000 30 -------------- 31 APPELLATE AUXILIARY OPERATIONS ............................. 279,963,000 32 -------------- 33 General Fund / State Operations 34 State Purposes Account 35 PERSONAL SERVICE 36 Personal service - regular .................... 33,247,000 37 -------------- 38 Amount available for personal service ....... 33,247,000 39 -------------- 16 12551-02-5 LEGISLATURE AND JUDICIARY 2025-26 1 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 2 Supplies and Materials ........................... 285,000 3 Travel ........................................... 286,000 4 Contractual Services ......................... 181,806,000 5 -------------- 6 Amount available for nonpersonal service ... 182,377,000 7 -------------- 8 Program account subtotal ................. 215,624,000 9 -------------- 10 Special Revenue Funds - Other / State Operations 11 Attorney Licensing Fund 12 For services and expenses funded from fees 13 required pursuant to section 468-a of the 14 judiciary law. 15 PERSONAL SERVICE 16 Personal service - regular .................... 23,542,000 17 Personal service - holiday / overtime 18 compensation .................................... 22,000 19 -------------- 20 Amount available for personal service ....... 23,564,000 21 -------------- 22 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 23 Supplies and Materials ........................... 155,000 24 Travel ............................................ 62,000 25 Contractual Services ........................... 5,558,000 26 -------------- 27 Amount available for nonpersonal service ..... 5,775,000 28 -------------- 29 Program fund subtotal ..................... 29,339,000 30 -------------- 31 Special Revenue Funds - Other / State Operations 32 Indigent Legal Services Fund 33 For services and expenses as provided by 34 section 98-b of the state finance law. 35 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 36 Contractual Services .......................... 25,000,000 37 -------------- 38 Amount available for nonpersonal service .... 25,000,000 39 -------------- 40 Program fund subtotal ..................... 25,000,000 41 -------------- 42 Special Revenue Funds - Other / State Operations 17 12551-02-5 LEGISLATURE AND JUDICIARY 2025-26 1 Federal IV-E Fund 2 PERSONAL SERVICE 3 Personal service - regular ....................... 500,000 4 -------------- 5 Amount available for personal service .......... 500,000 6 -------------- 7 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 8 Supplies and Materials ........................... 100,000 9 Travel ........................................... 100,000 10 Contractual Services ........................... 9,200,000 11 Equipment ........................................ 100,000 12 -------------- 13 Amount available for nonpersonal service ..... 9,500,000 14 -------------- 15 Program fund subtotal ..................... 10,000,000 16 -------------- 17 ADMINISTRATION AND GENERAL SUPPORT .......................... 26,791,000 18 -------------- 19 General Fund / State Operations 20 State Purposes Account 21 PERSONAL SERVICE 22 Personal service - regular .................... 20,988,000 23 Personal service - temporary ..................... 580,000 24 Personal service - holiday/overtime compensation .. 46,000 25 -------------- 26 Amount available for personal service ....... 21,614,000 27 -------------- 28 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 29 Supplies and Materials ........................... 122,000 30 Travel ........................................... 539,000 31 Contractual Services ........................... 2,819,000 32 -------------- 33 Amount available for nonpersonal service ..... 3,480,000 34 -------------- 35 Program account subtotal .................. 25,094,000 36 -------------- 37 Special Revenue Funds - Other / State Operations 38 Court Facilities Incentive Aid Fund 18 12551-02-5 LEGISLATURE AND JUDICIARY 2025-26 1 PERSONAL SERVICE 2 Personal service - regular ..................... 1,481,000 3 Personal service - holiday/overtime compen- 4 sation ......................................... 200,000 5 -------------- 6 Amount available for personal service ........ 1,681,000 7 -------------- 8 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 9 Supplies and Materials ............................. 1,000 10 Travel ............................................. 3,000 11 Contractual Services .............................. 12,000 12 -------------- 13 Amount available for nonpersonal service ........ 16,000 14 -------------- 15 Program fund subtotal ...................... 1,697,000 16 -------------- 17 LAWYERS' FUND FOR CLIENT PROTECTION ......................... 10,861,000 18 -------------- 19 Special Revenue Funds - Other / State Operations 20 Lawyers' Fund for Client Protection of the State of New 21 York 22 For expenses associated with the operation 23 of the Lawyers' Fund for Client Protection 24 of the State of New York; provided that, 25 notwithstanding any other provision of law 26 to the contrary, and in accordance with 27 section 4 of the state finance law, the 28 state comptroller is hereby authorized and 29 directed to transfer, upon the request of 30 the chief administrator of the courts, up 31 to $3,750,000 from the Special Revenue 32 Funds - Other / State Operations Attorney 33 Licensing Fund to the Lawyers' Fund for 34 Client Protection of the State of New York 35 on or before March 31, 2026. 36 PERSONAL SERVICE 37 Personal service - regular ....................... 716,000 38 -------------- 39 Amount available for personal service .......... 716,000 40 -------------- 19 12551-02-5 LEGISLATURE AND JUDICIARY 2025-26 1 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 2 Supplies and Materials ............................ 19,000 3 Travel ............................................ 20,000 4 Contractual Services .......................... 10,106,000 5 -------------- 6 Amount available for nonpersonal service .... 10,145,000 7 -------------- 8 Program fund subtotal ..................... 10,861,000 9 -------------- 20 12551-02-5 LEGISLATURE AND JUDICIARY 2025-26 1 AID TO LOCALITIES 2025-26 2 For payment according to the following schedule: 3 APPROPRIATIONS REAPPROPRIATIONS 4 General Fund ....................... 200,000,000 141,000,000 5 Special Revenue Funds - Other ...... 127,590,000 20,000,000 6 ---------------- ---------------- 7 All Funds ........................ 327,590,000 161,000,000 8 ================ ================ 9 SCHEDULE 10 AID TO LOCALITIES .......................................... 327,590,000 11 -------------- 12 General Fund / Aid to Localities 13 Local Assistance Account 14 For services and expenses associated with 15 the civil legal services program ........... 150,000,000 16 For services and expenses associated with 17 the justice court assistance program ......... 3,000,000 18 For suballocation to the office of indigent 19 legal services, at the direction of the 20 chief administrator of the courts, for 21 payment pursuant to law to New York city, 22 pursuant to an agreement with such city, 23 for services and expenses related to 24 implementation of caseload standards for 25 institutional providers representing indi- 26 gent clients in criminal cases in such 27 city. Notwithstanding any other provision 28 of law, monies received by the office of 29 indigent legal services pursuant to this 30 suballocation may be distributed to New 31 York city only to the extent necessary to 32 enable compliance with section 127.7 of 33 the rules of the chief administrator of 34 the courts (22 NYCRR §127.7). 35 For services and expenses associated with 36 the criminal caseload reduction program ..... 47,000,000 37 -------------- 38 Program account subtotal ................. 200,000,000 39 -------------- 40 Special Revenue Funds - Other / Aid to Localities 41 Court Facilities Incentive Aid Fund 42 For expenses necessary to implement the 43 provisions of law relating to the furnish- 44 ing of court facilities and the provisions 21 12551-02-5 LEGISLATURE AND JUDICIARY 2025-26 1 of section 219-a of the judiciary law; 2 provided that, notwithstanding any other 3 provision of law to the contrary, and in 4 accordance with section 4 of the state 5 finance law, where monies in the court 6 facilities incentive aid fund, including 7 such monies as may be transferred thereto 8 pursuant to subdivision 6 of section 94 of 9 the state finance law, are insufficient to 10 meet vouchers presented for payment 11 charged to this appropriation or for 12 transfers made pursuant to paragraph (b) 13 of subdivision 2 of such section, the 14 state comptroller is hereby authorized and 15 directed to transfer, upon the request of 16 the chief administrator of the courts, 17 sufficient monies to meet such vouchers or 18 to permit such transfers from the General 19 Fund to the Court Facilities Incentive Aid 20 Fund on or before March 31, 2026. 21 For services and expenses associated with 22 the court facilities incentive aid program . 127,590,000 23 -------------- 24 Program fund subtotal .................... 127,590,000 25 -------------- 22 12551-02-5 LEGISLATURE AND JUDICIARY 2025-26 1 CAPITAL PROJECTS 2025-26 2 For the comprehensive construction programs, purposes and 3 projects as herein specified in accordance with the 4 following schedule: 5 APPROPRIATIONS REAPPROPRIATIONS 6 Capital Projects Funds - Other ..... 50,000,000 50,600,000 7 ---------------- ---------------- 8 All Funds ........................ 50,000,000 50,600,000 9 ================ ================ 10 SCHEDULE 11 IT, FACILITY RENOVATION, AND SECURITY INITIATIVE PROGRAM 12 (CCP) ..................................................... 50,000,000 13 -------------- 14 Capital Projects Funds - Other 15 Capital Projects Fund 16 Program Improvement/Change Purpose 17 For services and expenses related to the 18 acquisition and development of technology, 19 including but not limited to equipment, 20 software and services (52012501) ............ 42,000,000 21 For services and expenses related to alter- 22 ations and improvements for health and 23 safety in courthouses (52022501) ............. 5,000,000 24 For expenses related to the acquisition of 25 equipment required upon general facility 26 renovation or upgrade (52032501) ............. 3,000,000 23 12551-02-5 LEGISLATURE AND JUDICIARY 2025-26 1 GENERAL STATE CHARGES 2025-26 2 For payment according to the following schedule: 3 APPROPRIATIONS REAPPROPRIATIONS 4 General Fund ....................... 995,119,000 145,700,000 5 Special Revenue Funds .............. 48,666,000 9,300,000 6 ---------------- ---------------- 7 All Funds ........................ 1,043,785,000 155,000,000 8 ================ ================ 9 SCHEDULE 10 GENERAL STATE CHARGES .................................... 1,043,785,000 11 -------------- 12 General Fund / State Operations 13 State Purposes Account 14 FRINGE BENEFITS 15 For Fringe Benefits .......................... 995,119,000 16 -------------- 17 Program account subtotal ................. 995,119,000 18 -------------- 19 Special Revenue Funds - Other / State Operations 20 Attorney Licensing Fund 21 FRINGE BENEFITS 22 For Fringe Benefits ........................... 11,433,000 23 -------------- 24 Program fund subtotal ..................... 11,433,000 25 -------------- 26 Special Revenue Funds - Other / State Operations 27 Court Facilities Incentive Aid Fund 28 FRINGE BENEFITS 29 For Fringe Benefits .............................. 985,000 30 -------------- 31 Program fund subtotal ........................ 985,000 32 -------------- 33 Special Revenue Funds - Other / State Operations 34 Lawyers' Fund for Client Protection 35 FRINGE BENEFITS 36 For Fringe Benefits .............................. 350,000 37 -------------- 24 12551-02-5 LEGISLATURE AND JUDICIARY 2025-26 1 Program fund subtotal ........................ 350,000 2 -------------- 3 Special Revenue Funds - Other / State Operations 4 New York City County Clerks' Operations Offset Fund 5 FRINGE BENEFITS 6 For Fringe Benefits ........................... 14,780,000 7 -------------- 8 Program fund subtotal ..................... 14,780,000 9 -------------- 10 Special Revenue Funds - Other / State Operations 11 Judiciary Data Processing Offset Fund 12 FRINGE BENEFITS 13 For Fringe Benefits ........................... 20,945,000 14 -------------- 15 Program fund subtotal ..................... 20,945,000 16 -------------- 17 Special Revenue Funds - Other / State Operations 18 Federal IV-E Fund 19 FRINGE BENEFITS 20 For Fringe Benefits .............................. 173,000 21 -------------- 22 Program fund subtotal ........................ 173,000 23 -------------- 25 12551-02-5 LEGISLATURE AND JUDICIARY 2025-26 1 REAPPROPRIATIONS 2 § 3. The several amounts named in this section, or so much thereof as 3 shall be sufficient to accomplish the purposes designated being the 4 unexpended balances of a prior year's appropriation, are hereby reappro- 5 priated from the same funds and made available for the same purposes as 6 the prior year's appropriation, unless amended herein, for the state 7 fiscal year beginning April 1, 2025. 8 THE JUDICIARY 9 STATE OPERATIONS AND AID TO LOCALITIES REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 10 SCHEDULE 11 COURTS OF ORIGINAL JURISDICTION 12 General Fund / State Operations 13 State Purposes Account 14 By chapter 51, section 2, of the laws of 2024: 15 Personal service - regular ... 1,646,645,205 ....... (re. $28,812,000) 16 Personal service - temporary ... 5,430,871 ............. (re. $95,000) 17 Personal service - holiday / overtime compensation ................... 18 38,316,734 .......................................... (re. $670,000) 19 Special Revenue Funds - Other / State Operations 20 New York City County Clerks' Operations Offset Fund 21 By chapter 51, section 2, of the laws of 2024: 22 Personal service - regular ... 24,437,284 ............. (re. $428,000) 23 Personal service - holiday / overtime compensation ................... 24 2,161 ................................................. (re. $1,000) 25 Special Revenue Funds - Other / State Operations 26 Judiciary Data Processing Offset Fund 27 By chapter 51, section 2, of the laws of 2024: 28 Personal service - regular ... 59,337,524 ........... (re. $1,038,000) 29 Personal service - holiday / overtime compensation ................... 30 594,664 .............................................. (re. $10,000) 31 Special Revenue Funds - Other / State Operations 32 Court Facilities Incentive Aid Fund 33 By chapter 51, section 2, of the laws of 2024: 34 Personal service - regular ... 517,040 .................. (re. $9,000) 35 Special Revenue Funds - Federal / State Operations 36 Federal Operating Grants Fund 37 Federal Miscellaneous Grants (Operating) Account 38 By chapter 51, section 2, of the laws of 2024: 26 12551-02-5 LEGISLATURE AND JUDICIARY 2025-26 1 For services and expenses including travel outside the state and the 2 payment of liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2024 ............. 3 9,500,000 ......................................... (re. $9,500,000) 4 By chapter 51, section 2, of the laws of 2023, as reappropriated by 5 chapter 51, section 3, of the laws of 2024: 6 For services and expenses including travel outside the state and the 7 payment of liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2023 ............. 8 9,500,000 ......................................... (re. $6,200,000) 9 By chapter 51, section 2, of the laws of 2022, as reappropriated by 10 chapter 51, section 3, of the laws of 2024: 11 For services and expenses including travel outside the state and the 12 payment of liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2022 ............. 13 9,500,000 ......................................... (re. $5,300,000) 14 By chapter 51, section 2, of the laws of 2021, as reappropriated by 15 chapter 51, section 3, of the laws of 2024: 16 For services and expenses including travel outside the state and the 17 payment of liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2021 ............. 18 9,500,000 ......................................... (re. $9,500,000) 19 By chapter 51, section 2, of the laws of 2020, as reappropriated by 20 chapter 51, section 3, of the laws of 2024: 21 For services and expenses including travel outside the state and the 22 payment of liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2020 ............. 23 9,500,000 ........................................... (re. $400,000) 24 By chapter 51, section 2, of the laws of 2019, as reappropriated by 25 chapter 51, section 3, of the laws of 2024: 26 For services and expenses including travel outside the state and the 27 payment of liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2019 ............. 28 9,500,000 ........................................... (re. $100,000) 29 Special Revenue Funds - Federal / State Operations 30 Federal Grants - Health and Human Services 31 By chapter 51, section 2, of the laws of 2024: 32 For services and expenses including travel outside the state and the 33 payment of liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2024 ............. 34 9,500,000 ......................................... (re. $9,000,000) 35 By chapter 51, section 2, of the laws of 2023, as reappropriated by 36 chapter 51, section 3, of the laws of 2024: 37 For services and expenses including travel outside the state and the 38 payment of liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2023 ............. 39 9,500,000 ........................................... (re. $600,000) 40 By chapter 51, section 2, of the laws of 2022, as reappropriated by 41 chapter 51, section 3, of the laws of 2024: 42 For services and expenses including travel outside the state and the 43 payment of liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2022 ............. 44 9,500,000 ........................................... (re. $500,000) 27 12551-02-5 LEGISLATURE AND JUDICIARY 2025-26 1 By chapter 51, section 2, of the laws of 2021, as reappropriated by 2 chapter 51, section 3, of the laws of 2024: 3 For services and expenses including travel outside the state and the 4 payment of liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2021 ............. 5 9,500,000 ........................................... (re. $100,000) 6 By chapter 51, section 2, of the laws of 2020, as reappropriated by 7 chapter 51, section 3, of the laws of 2024: 8 For services and expenses including travel outside the state and the 9 payment of liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2020 ............. 10 9,500,000 ........................................... (re. $500,000) 11 By chapter 51, section 2, of the laws of 2019, as reappropriated by 12 chapter 51, section 3, of the laws of 2024: 13 For services and expenses including travel outside the state and the 14 payment of liabilities incurred prior to April 1, 2019 ............. 15 9,500,000 ........................................... (re. $100,000) 16 Special Revenue Funds - Other / State Operations 17 Miscellaneous Special Revenue Fund 18 By chapter 51, section 2, of the laws of 2024: 19 Supplies and Materials ... 75,000 ...................... (re. $75,000) 20 Travel ... 75,000 ...................................... (re. $75,000) 21 Contractual Services ... 2,500,000 .................. (re. $2,300,000) 22 Equipment ... 225,000 ................................. (re. $225,000) 23 By chapter 51, section 2, of the laws of 2023, as reappropriated by 24 chapter 51, section 3, of the laws of 2024: 25 Supplies and Materials ... 75,000 ...................... (re. $75,000) 26 Travel ... 75,000 ...................................... (re. $75,000) 27 Contractual Services ... 2,500,000 .................. (re. $2,400,000) 28 Equipment ... 225,000 ................................. (re. $225,000) 29 By chapter 51, section 2, of the laws of 2022, as reappropriated by 30 chapter 51, section 3, of the laws of 2024: 31 Contractual Services ... 2,500,000 .................... (re. $300,000) 32 By chapter 51, section 2, of the laws of 2021, as reappropriated by 33 chapter 51, section 3, of the laws of 2024: 34 Contractual Services ... 2,000,000 .................... (re. $400,000) 35 Equipment ... 150,000 ................................... (re. $2,000) 36 COURT OF APPEALS 37 General Fund / State Operations 38 State Purposes Account 39 By chapter 51, section 2, of the laws of 2024: 40 Personal service - regular ... 16,824,781 ............. (re. $294,000) 41 Personal service - holiday / overtime compensation ................... 42 156,300 ............................................... (re. $3,000) 43 APPELLATE COURT OPERATIONS 28 12551-02-5 LEGISLATURE AND JUDICIARY 2025-26 1 General Fund / State Operations 2 State Purposes Account 3 By chapter 51, section 2, of the laws of 2024: 4 Personal service - regular ... 96,547,927 ........... (re. $1,689,000) 5 Personal service - temporary ... 1,421,105 ............. (re. $25,000) 6 Personal service - holiday / overtime compensation ................... 7 168,820 ............................................... (re. $3,000) 8 APPELLATE AUXILIARY OPERATIONS 9 General Fund / State Operations 10 State Purposes Account 11 By chapter 51, section 2, of the laws of 2024: 12 Personal service - regular ... 33,609,587 ............. (re. $588,000) 13 Special Revenue Funds - Other / State Operations 14 Federal IV-E Fund 15 By chapter 51, section 2, of the laws of 2024: 16 Supplies and Materials ... 1,000,000 ................ (re. $1,000,000) 17 Travel ... 1,000,000 ................................ (re. $1,000,000) 18 Contractual Services ... 7,000,000 .................. (re. $6,000,000) 19 Equipment ... 1,000,000 ............................. (re. $1,000,000) 20 Special Revenue Funds - Other / State Operations 21 Attorney Licensing Fund 22 By chapter 51, section 2, of the laws of 2024: 23 Personal service - regular ... 20,179,014 ............. (re. $353,000) 24 Personal service - holiday / overtime compensation ................... 25 16,685 ................................................ (re. $1,000) 26 ADMINISTRATION AND GENERAL SUPPORT 27 General Fund / State Operations 28 State Purposes Account 29 By chapter 51, section 2, of the laws of 2024: 30 Personal service - regular ... 14,407,024 ............. (re. $252,000) 31 Special Revenue Funds - Other / State Operations 32 Attorney Licensing Fund 33 By chapter 51, section 2, of the laws of 2024: 34 Personal service - regular ... 1,491,053 ............... (re. $26,000) 35 Special Revenue Funds - Other / State Operations 36 Judiciary Data Processing Offset Fund 37 By chapter 51, section 2, of the laws of 2024: 38 Personal service - regular ... 3,558,434 ............... (re. $62,000) 29 12551-02-5 LEGISLATURE AND JUDICIARY 2025-26 1 Personal service - holiday / overtime compensation ................... 2 19,000 ................................................ (re. $1,000) 3 Special Revenue Funds - Other / State Operations 4 Court Facilities Incentive Aid Fund 5 By chapter 51, section 2, of the laws of 2024: 6 Personal service - regular ... 1,294,962 ............... (re. $23,000) 7 JUDICIARY-WIDE MAINTENANCE UNDISTRIBUTED 8 General Fund - State Operations 9 State Purposes Account 10 By chapter 51, section 2, of the laws of 2024: 11 Personal service - regular ... 34,600,000 ............. (re. $605,000) 12 LAWYERS' FUND FOR CLIENT PROTECTION 13 Special Revenue Funds - Other / State Operations 14 Lawyers' Fund for Client Protection of the State of New York 15 By chapter 51, section 2, of the laws of 2024: 16 Personal service - regular ... 680,636 ................. (re. $12,000) 30 12551-02-5 LEGISLATURE AND JUDICIARY 2025-26 1 AID TO LOCALITIES REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 2 Special Revenue Funds - Other / Aid to Localities 3 Court Facilities Incentive Aid Fund 4 By chapter 51, section 2, of the laws of 2024: 5 For expenses necessary to implement the provisions of law relating to 6 the furnishing of court facilities and the provisions of section 7 219-a of the judiciary law; provided that, notwithstanding any other 8 provision of law to the contrary, and in accordance with section 4 9 of the state finance law, where monies in the court facilities 10 incentive aid fund, including such monies as may be transferred 11 thereto pursuant to subdivision 6 of section 94 of the state finance 12 law, are insufficient to meet vouchers presented for payment charged 13 to this appropriation or for transfers made pursuant to paragraph 14 (b) of subdivision 2 of such section, the state comptroller is here- 15 by authorized and directed to transfer, upon the request of the 16 chief administrator of the courts, sufficient monies to meet such 17 vouchers or to permit such transfers from the General Fund to the 18 Court Facilities Incentive Aid Fund on or before March 31, 2025. 19 For services and expenses associated with the court facilities incen- 20 tive aid program ... 122,902,889 ................. (re. $20,000,000) 21 General Fund / Aid to Localities 22 Local Assistance Account 23 By chapter 51, section 2, of the laws of 2024: 24 For suballocation to the office of indigent legal services, at the 25 direction of the chief administrator of the courts, for payment 26 pursuant to law to New York city, pursuant to an agreement with such 27 city, for services and expenses related to implementation of case- 28 load standards for institutional providers representing indigent 29 clients in criminal cases in such city. Notwithstanding any other 30 provision of law, monies received by the office of indigent legal 31 services pursuant to this suballocation may be distributed to New 32 York city only to the extent necessary to enable compliance with 33 section 127.7 of the rules of the chief administrator of the court 34 (22 NYCRR §127.7). 35 For services and expenses associated with the Criminal Caseload 36 Reduction Program ... 47,000,000 ................. (re. $47,000,000) 37 By chapter 51, section 2, of the laws of 2023, as reappropriated by 38 chapter 51, section 3, of the laws of 2024: 39 For suballocation to the office of indigent legal services, at the 40 direction of the chief administrator of the courts, for payment 41 pursuant to law to New York city, pursuant to an agreement with such 42 city, for services and expenses related to implementation of case- 43 load standards for institutional providers representing indigent 44 clients in criminal cases in such city. Notwithstanding any other 45 provision of law, monies received by the office of indigent legal 46 services pursuant to this suballocation may be distributed to New 47 York city only to the extent necessary to enable compliance with 48 section 127.7 of the rules of the chief administrator of the court 49 (22 NYCRR §127.7). 31 12551-02-5 LEGISLATURE AND JUDICIARY 2025-26 1 For services and expenses associated with the Criminal Caseload 2 Reduction Program ... 47,000,000 ................. (re. $47,000,000) 3 By chapter 51, section 2, of the laws of 2022, as reappropriated by 4 chapter 51, section 3, of the laws of 2024: 5 For suballocation to the office of indigent legal services, at the 6 direction of the chief administrator of the courts, for payment 7 pursuant to law to New York city, pursuant to an agreement with such 8 city, for services and expenses related to implementation of case- 9 load standards for institutional providers representing indigent 10 clients in criminal cases in such city. Notwithstanding any other 11 provision of law, monies received by the office of indigent legal 12 services pursuant to this suballocation may be distributed to New 13 York city only to the extent necessary to enable compliance with 14 section 127.7 of the rules of the chief administrator of the court 15 (22 NYCRR §127.7). 16 For services and expenses associated with the Criminal Caseload 17 Reduction Program ... 47,000,000 ................. (re. $47,000,000) 32 12551-02-5 LEGISLATURE AND JUDICIARY 2025-26 1 CAPITAL PROJECTS REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 2 COURTHOUSE IMPROVEMENTS (CCP) 3 Capital Projects Fund 4 Preservation of Facilities Purpose 5 By chapter 51, section 2, of the laws of 2007, as reappropriated by 6 chapter 51, section 3, of the laws of 2024: 7 For expenses associated with the acquisition of and improvements to a 8 training academy in Kings County for the training of court security 9 personnel (52JT0707) ... 33,700,000 ............... (re. $1,000,000) 10 By chapter 51, section 2, of the laws of 2007, as amended by chapter 51, 11 section 3, of the laws of 2012, as reappropriated by chapter 51, 12 section 3, of the laws of 2024: 13 For expenses associated with the acquisition of and improvements to a 14 training academy in Kings County for the training of court security 15 personnel (52JT0707) ... 24,200,000 ............... (re. $1,000,000) 16 IT, FACILITY RENOVATION, COURT RECORDS AND SECURITY INITIATIVE PROGRAM 17 (CCP) 18 Preservation of Facility Purpose 19 By chapter 51, section 2, of the laws of 2024: 20 For expenses associated with the improvements to Appellate 1st Divi- 21 sion Facilities ... 2,300,000 ..................... (re. $2,300,000) 22 For expenses associated with the improvements to Appellate 2nd Divi- 23 sion Facilities ... 9,700,000 ..................... (re. $9,700,000) 24 Capital Projects Funds - Other 25 Capital Projects Fund 26 Program Improvement/Change Purpose 27 By chapter 51, section 2, of the laws of 2024: 28 For services and expenses related to the acquisition and development 29 of technology, including but not limited to equipment, software and 30 services (52012401) ... 30,000,000 ............... (re. $24,000,000) 31 For services and expenses related to alterations and improvements for 32 health and safety in courthouses (52022401) ........................ 33 5,000,000 ......................................... (re. $4,500,000) 34 For expenses related to the acquisition of equipment required upon 35 general facility renovation or upgrade (52032401) .................. 36 3,000,000 ......................................... (re. $2,000,000) 37 By chapter 51, section 2, of the laws of 2023, as reappropriated by 38 chapter 51, section 3, of the laws of 2024: 39 For services and expenses related to the acquisition and development 40 of technology, including but not limited to equipment, software and 41 services (52012301) ... 22,000,000 ................ (re. $5,000,000) 33 12551-02-5 LEGISLATURE AND JUDICIARY 2025-26 1 For services and expenses related to alterations and improvements for 2 health and safety in courthouses (52022301) ........................ 3 3,000,000 ......................................... (re. $1,000,000) 4 For expenses related to the acquisition of equipment required upon 5 general facility renovation or upgrade (52032301) .................. 6 3,000,000 ........................................... (re. $100,000) 34 12551-02-5 LEGISLATURE AND JUDICIARY 2025-26 1 GENERAL STATE CHARGES - REAPPROPRIATIONS 2025-26 2 General Fund / State Operations 3 State Purposes Account 4 By chapter 51, section 2, of the laws of 2024: 5 For Fringe Benefits ... 915,897,881 ............... (re. $145,700,000) 6 Special Revenue Funds - Other / State Operations 7 Attorney Licensing Fund 8 By chapter 51, section 2, of the laws of 2024: 9 For Fringe Benefits ... 9,127,206 ................... (re. $1,500,000) 10 Special Revenue Funds - Other / State Operations 11 Court Facilities Incentive Aid Fund 12 By chapter 51, section 2, of the laws of 2024: 13 For Fringe Benefits ... 1,022,574 ..................... (re. $200,000) 14 Special Revenue Funds - Other / State Operations 15 Lawyers' Fund for Client Protection 16 By chapter 51, section 2, of the laws of 2024: 17 For Fringe Benefits ... 312,306 ........................ (re. $50,000) 18 Special Revenue Funds - Other / State Operations 19 New York City County Clerks' Operations Offset Fund 20 By chapter 51, section 2, of the laws of 2024: 21 For Fringe Benefits ... 14,586,199 .................. (re. $2,450,000) 22 Special Revenue Funds - Other / State Operations 23 Judiciary Data Processing Offset Fund 24 By chapter 51, section 2, of the laws of 2024: 25 For Fringe Benefits ... 30,781,295 .................. (re. $5,100,000) 35 12551-02-5 LEGISLATURE AND JUDICIARY 2025-26 1 § 4. The several amounts named herein, or so much thereof as shall be 2 sufficient to accomplish the purpose designated, being the unexpended 3 balances of prior year's appropriations, are hereby reappropriated from 4 the same funds and made available for the same purposes as the prior 5 year's appropriations, unless amended herein, for the state fiscal year 6 beginning April 1, 2025. 7 For the purpose of complying with the state finance law, the chapter, 8 section, and year of the last act reappropriating a former original 9 appropriation or any part thereof was, unless otherwise indicated, chap- 10 ter 51, section 4, of the laws of 2024. Where the full text of law being 11 continued is not shown, leader dots ... are used. However, unless a 12 change is clearly indicated by the use of brackets [ ] for deletions and 13 italics for additions, the purposes, amounts, funding source and all 14 other aspects pertinent to each item of appropriation shall be as last 15 appropriated. 16 THE LEGISLATURE 17 GENERAL FUND / STATE OPERATIONS 18 STATE PURPOSES ACCOUNT 19 THE SENATE 20 SCHEDULE 21 PERSONAL SERVICE 22 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 23 For payment of salaries to Members, 63, pursuant to section 5 of the 24 legislative law ... 8,946,000 ..................... (re. $2,501,385) 25 For payment of allowances to members designated by the temporary pres- 26 ident, pursuant to the schedule of such allowances set forth in 27 section 5-a of the legislative law ... 1,289,500 .. (re. $1,176,250) 28 For personal service of employees and for temporary and expert 29 services of members' offices and of standing committees: 30 Personal service-regular ... 42,047,475 ............ (re. $15,345,184) 31 For personal service of employees and for temporary and expert 32 services for senate operations: 33 Personal service-regular ... 40,150,238 ............ (re. $17,364,575) 34 For personal service of employees and for temporary and expert 35 services for the senate student program office: 36 Personal service-regular ... 278,751 .................. (re. $147,760) 37 Temporary service ... 819,562 ......................... (re. $519,786) 38 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 39 For payment of salaries to Members, 63, pursuant to section 5 of the 40 legislative law ... 8,946,000 ........................ (re. $19,491) 41 For payment of allowances to members designated by the temporary pres- 42 ident, pursuant to the schedule of such allowances set forth in 43 section 5-a of the legislative law ... 1,289,500 .. (re. $1,138,500) 44 For personal service of employees and for temporary and expert 45 services of members' offices and of standing committees: 46 Personal service-regular ... 39,818,672 ............ (re. $12,384,176) 36 12551-02-5 LEGISLATURE AND JUDICIARY 2025-26 1 For personal service of employees and for temporary and expert 2 services for senate operations: 3 Personal service-regular ... 37,926,450 ............ (re. $16,018,660) 4 For personal service of employees and for temporary and expert 5 services for the senate student program office: 6 Personal service-regular ... 268,030 .................. (re. $117,544) 7 Temporary service ... 720,086 ......................... (re. $142,393) 8 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2022: 9 For payment of salaries to Members, 63, pursuant to section 5 of the 10 legislative law ... 6,930,000 ....................... (re. $220,537) 11 For payment of allowances to members designated by the temporary pres- 12 ident, pursuant to the schedule of such allowances set forth in 13 section 5-a of the legislative law ... 1,289,500 .. (re. $1,138,500) 14 For personal service of employees and for temporary and expert 15 services of members' offices and of standing committees: 16 Personal service-regular ... 38,211,908 ............. (re. $3,310,132) 17 For personal service of employees and for temporary and expert 18 services for senate operations: 19 Personal service-regular ... 36,398,610 ............. (re. $7,386,918) 20 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2021: 21 For payment of allowances to members designated by the temporary pres- 22 ident, pursuant to the schedule of such allowances set forth in 23 section 5-a of the legislative law ... 1,289,500 .. (re. $1,138,500) 24 For personal service of employees and for temporary and expert 25 services of members' offices and of standing committees: 26 Personal service-regular ... 34,949,668 ............. (re. $2,229,283) 27 For personal service of employees and for temporary and expert 28 services for senate operations: 29 Personal service-regular ... 33,189,185 ............. (re. $6,113,182) 30 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2020: 31 For payment of allowances to members designated by the temporary pres- 32 ident, pursuant to the schedule of such allowances set forth in 33 section 5-a of the legislative law ... 1,289,500 .. (re. $1,138,500) 34 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2019: 35 For payment of allowances to members designated by the temporary pres- 36 ident, pursuant to the schedule of such allowances set forth in 37 section 5-a of the legislative law ... 1,289,500 .. (re. $1,138,500) 38 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2018: 39 For payment of allowances to members designated by the temporary pres- 40 ident, pursuant to the schedule of such allowances set forth in 41 section 5-a of the legislative law ... 1,289,500 .... (re. $541,377) 42 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2017: 43 For payment of allowances to members designated by the temporary pres- 44 ident, pursuant to the schedule of such allowances set forth in 45 section 5-a of the legislative law ... 1,289,500 .... (re. $297,125) 46 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2016: 37 12551-02-5 LEGISLATURE AND JUDICIARY 2025-26 1 For payment of allowances to members designated by the temporary pres- 2 ident, pursuant to the schedule of such allowances set forth in 3 section 5-a of the legislative law ... 1,289,500 .... (re. $285,250) 4 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2015: 5 For payment of allowances to members designated by the temporary pres- 6 ident, pursuant to the schedule of such allowances set forth in 7 section 5-a of the legislative law ... 1,289,500 .... (re. $284,625) 8 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2014: 9 For payment of allowances to members designated by the temporary pres- 10 ident, pursuant to the schedule of such allowances set forth in 11 section 5-a of the legislative law ... 1,289,500 .... (re. $310,625) 12 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2013: 13 For payment of allowances to members designated by the temporary pres- 14 ident, pursuant to the schedule of such allowances set forth in 15 section 5-a of the legislative law ... 1,289,500 .... (re. $290,125) 16 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2012: 17 For payment of allowances to members designated by the temporary pres- 18 ident, pursuant to the schedule of such allowances set forth in 19 section 5-a of the legislative law ... 1,289,500 .... (re. $907,875) 20 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 21 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 22 Supplies and materials ... 9,365,595 ................ (re. $9,365,595) 23 Travel ... 1,554,141 ................................ (re. $1,554,141) 24 Miscellaneous contractual services, including, but not limited to, 25 childcare expenses incurred by members of the New York State Senate 26 in the execution of their duties of public office .................. 27 11,557,989 ........................................ (re. $6,057,989) 28 Equipment ... 2,623,233 ............................. (re. $2,622,500) 29 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 30 Supplies and materials ... 9,365,595 ................ (re. $9,365,449) 31 Travel ... 1,554,141 ................................ (re. $1,554,141) 32 Miscellaneous contractual services ... 11,557,989 ... (re. $2,302,211) 33 Equipment ... 2,623,233 ............................. (re. $2,030,152) 34 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 35 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2022: 36 Supplies and materials ... 9,365,595 .................. (re. $338,072) 37 Travel ... 1,554,141 ................................ (re. $1,554,141) 38 Miscellaneous contractual services ... 11,557,989 ... (re. $7,891,631) 39 Equipment ... 2,623,233 ............................... (re. $917,155) 40 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2021: 41 Supplies and materials ... 9,365,595 .................... (re. $5,000) 42 Travel ... 1,554,141 ................................ (re. $1,554,141) 43 Miscellaneous contractual services ... 11,557,989 ... (re. $7,196,941) 44 Equipment ... 2,623,233 ............................. (re. $1,783,482) 38 12551-02-5 LEGISLATURE AND JUDICIARY 2025-26 1 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2020: 2 Supplies and materials ... 9,365,595 .................... (re. $5,000) 3 Travel ... 1,554,141 ................................ (re. $1,544,607) 4 Miscellaneous contractual services ... 11,557,989 ... (re. $3,272,760) 5 Equipment ... 2,623,233 ............................. (re. $1,426,331) 6 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2019: 7 Travel ... 1,554,141 ................................ (re. $1,547,194) 8 Miscellaneous contractual services ... 11,557,989 ...... (re. $19,727) 9 Equipment ... 2,623,233 ............................. (re. $2,100,658) 10 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2018: 11 Travel ... 1,554,141 .................................. (re. $914,801) 12 Equipment ... 2,623,233 ............................. (re. $2,070,462) 13 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2017: 14 Equipment ... 2,623,233 ............................... (re. $613,485) 15 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2016: 16 Equipment ... 2,623,233 ............................... (re. $174,260) 17 THE ASSEMBLY 18 SCHEDULE 19 PERSONAL SERVICE 20 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 21 Members, 150, payment of salaries pursuant to section 5 of the legis- 22 lative law ... 21,300,000 ......................... (re. $5,842,386) 23 For payment of allowances to members designated by the speaker pursu- 24 ant to the provisions of section 5-a of the legislative law ... 25 1,592,500 ......................................... (re. $1,412,875) 26 For personal service of employees and for temporary and expert 27 services of members' offices and of standing committees and subcom- 28 mittees: 29 Personal service-regular ... 34,000,000 ............ (re. $11,949,655) 30 Temporary service ... 2,500,000 ....................... (re. $979,451) 31 For personal service of employees and for temporary and expert 32 services for administrative and program support operations: 33 Personal service-regular ... 41,648,990 ............ (re. $18,938,594) 34 Temporary service ... 450,000 ......................... (re. $298,932) 35 For the Assembly Intern and Youth Participation Program for personal 36 service of employees and for temporary and expert services: 37 Personal service-regular ... 425,000 .................. (re. $217,370) 38 Temporary service ... 1,400,000 ..................... (re. $1,168,425) 39 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 40 Members, 150, payment of salaries pursuant to section 5 of the legis- 41 lative law ... 21,300,000 ............................ (re. $35,341) 42 For payment of allowances to members designated by the speaker pursu- 43 ant to the provisions of section 5-a of the legislative law ... 44 1,592,500 ......................................... (re. $1,353,000) 39 12551-02-5 LEGISLATURE AND JUDICIARY 2025-26 1 For personal service of employees and for temporary and expert 2 services of members' offices and of standing committees and subcom- 3 mittees: 4 Personal service-regular ... 32,500,000 ............. (re. $1,527,412) 5 Temporary service ... 2,500,000 ....................... (re. $369,274) 6 For personal service of employees and for temporary and expert 7 services for administrative and program support operations: 8 Personal service-regular ... 46,048,356 ............. (re. $6,608,164) 9 Temporary service ... 450,000 ........................... (re. $9,386) 10 For the Assembly Intern and Youth Participation Program for personal 11 service of employees and for temporary and expert services: 12 Personal service-regular ... 425,000 .................. (re. $106,136) 13 Temporary service ... 1,400,000 ....................... (re. $202,015) 14 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2022: 15 Members, 150, payment of salaries pursuant to section 5 of the legis- 16 lative law ... 16,500,000 ............................ (re. $79,409) 17 For payment of allowances to members designated by the speaker pursu- 18 ant to the provisions of section 5-a of the legislative law ... 19 1,592,500 ......................................... (re. $1,353,000) 20 For personal service of employees and for temporary and expert 21 services of members' offices and of standing committees and subcom- 22 mittees: 23 Personal service-regular ... 31,262,500 ............. (re. $1,000,000) 24 Temporary service ... 2,357,500 ....................... (re. $380,000) 25 For personal service of employees and for temporary and expert 26 services for administrative and program support operations: 27 Personal service-regular ... 44,533,477 ............. (re. $4,277,554) 28 Temporary service ... 350,000 .......................... (re. $20,000) 29 For the Assembly Intern and Youth Participation Program for personal 30 service of employees and for temporary and expert services: 31 Personal service-regular ... 350,000 ................... (re. $18,896) 32 Temporary service ... 1,350,000 ....................... (re. $200,000) 33 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2021: 34 Members, 150, payment of salaries pursuant to section 5 of the legis- 35 lative law ... 16,500,000 ............................ (re. $10,000) 36 For payment of allowances to members designated by the speaker pursu- 37 ant to the provisions of section 5-a of the legislative law ... 38 1,592,500 ......................................... (re. $1,353,000) 39 For personal service of employees and for temporary and expert 40 services of members' offices and of standing committees and subcom- 41 mittees: 42 Personal service-regular ... 31,262,500 ............. (re. $1,000,000) 43 Temporary service ... 2,357,500 ..................... (re. $1,100,000) 44 For personal service of employees and for temporary and expert 45 services for administrative and program support operations: 46 Personal service-regular ... 39,923,750 ............. (re. $6,500,000) 47 Temporary service ... 312,625 .......................... (re. $64,000) 48 For the Assembly Intern and Youth Participation Program for personal 49 service of employees and for temporary and expert services: 50 Temporary service ... 1,326,000 ....................... (re. $650,000) 51 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2020: 40 12551-02-5 LEGISLATURE AND JUDICIARY 2025-26 1 For payment of allowances to members designated by the speaker pursu- 2 ant to the provisions of section 5-a of the legislative law ... 3 1,592,500 ......................................... (re. $1,352,999) 4 For personal service of employees and for temporary and expert 5 services of members' offices and of standing committees and subcom- 6 mittees: 7 Personal service-regular ... 30,500,000 ............... (re. $300,000) 8 Temporary service ... 2,300,000 ..................... (re. $1,200,000) 9 For personal service of employees and for temporary and expert 10 services for administrative and program support operations: 11 Personal service-regular ... 38,950,000 ............... (re. $900,000) 12 Temporary service ... 305,000 .......................... (re. $73,000) 13 For the Assembly Intern and Youth Participation Program for personal 14 service of employees and for temporary and expert services: 15 Temporary service ... 1,300,000 ....................... (re. $450,000) 16 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2019: 17 Members, 150, payment of salaries pursuant to section 5 of the legis- 18 lative law ... 16,846,154 ........................... (re. $400,000) 19 For payment of allowances to members designated by the speaker pursu- 20 ant to the provisions of section 5-a of the legislative law ... 21 1,592,500 ......................................... (re. $1,353,430) 22 For personal service of employees and for temporary and expert 23 services for administrative and program support operations: 24 Personal service-regular ... 37,739,454 ............. (re. $3,200,000) 25 Temporary service ... 255,000 .......................... (re. $50,000) 26 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 1992: 27 Members, 150, payment of salaries pursuant to section 5 of the legis- 28 lative law ... ... 8,625,000 ........................ (re. $2,212) 29 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 30 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 31 Supplies and materials ... 3,500,000 ................ (re. $1,548,244) 32 Travel ... 3,000,000 ................................ (re. $2,091,010) 33 Miscellaneous contractual services ... 24,000,000 .. (re. $14,073,261) 34 Equipment ... 4,000,000 ............................. (re. $2,085,552) 35 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 36 Supplies and materials ... 8,000,000 ................ (re. $3,411,955) 37 Travel ... 2,500,000 .................................. (re. $276,242) 38 Miscellaneous contractual services ... 14,000,000 ..... (re. $980,785) 39 Equipment ... 1,800,000 ............................... (re. $724,725) 40 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2022: 41 Supplies and materials ... 7,900,000 ................ (re. $1,006,418) 42 Travel ... 2,900,000 .................................. (re. $908,594) 43 Miscellaneous contractual services ... 13,100,000 ..... (re. $473,231) 44 Equipment ... 1,800,000 ............................... (re. $295,187) 45 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2021: 46 Supplies and materials ... 7,897,500 ................ (re. $1,265,005) 47 Travel ... 2,856,500 ................................ (re. $1,246,317) 41 12551-02-5 LEGISLATURE AND JUDICIARY 2025-26 1 Miscellaneous contractual services ... 13,080,500 ..... (re. $398,092) 2 Equipment ... 1,753,976 ................................ (re. $97,364) 3 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2020: 4 Supplies and materials ... 7,742,775 .................. (re. $421,666) 5 Travel ... 2,800,570 ................................ (re. $1,915,325) 6 Miscellaneous contractual services ... 12,824,330 ..... (re. $249,863) 7 Equipment ... 1,718,993 ............................... (re. $100,000) 8 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2019: 9 Supplies and materials ... 7,742,775 .................... (re. $9,800) 10 Travel ... 2,800,570 .................................. (re. $500,000) 11 Miscellaneous contractual services ... 12,824,330 ...... (re. $24,933) 12 Equipment ... 1,399,170 ................................. (re. $5,000) 13 ASSEMBLY WAYS AND MEANS COMMITTEE 14 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 15 PERSONAL SERVICE 16 Personal service-regular ... 6,617,132 .............. (re. $3,326,781) 17 Temporary service ... 120,000 ......................... (re. $106,968) 18 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 19 Supplies and materials ... 280,000 .................... (re. $228,297) 20 Travel ... 5,000 ........................................ (re. $5,000) 21 Contractual services ... 140,000 ...................... (re. $113,353) 22 Equipment ... 10,000 .................................... (re. $7,232) 23 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 24 PERSONAL SERVICE 25 Personal service-regular ... 6,341,281 .............. (re. $1,703,909) 26 Temporary service ... 120,000 .......................... (re. $76,615) 27 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 28 Supplies and materials ... 280,000 ..................... (re. $92,598) 29 Travel ... 5,000 ........................................ (re. $3,932) 30 Contractual services ... 140,000 ....................... (re. $31,557) 31 Equipment ... 10,000 .................................... (re. $6,961) 32 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2022: 33 PERSONAL SERVICE 34 Personal service-regular ... 6,139,648 .............. (re. $1,778,740) 35 Temporary service ... 120,770 ......................... (re. $102,994) 42 12551-02-5 LEGISLATURE AND JUDICIARY 2025-26 1 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 2 Supplies and materials ... 280,000 ..................... (re. $98,526) 3 Travel ... 5,000 ........................................ (re. $5,000) 4 Contractual services ... 140,000 ....................... (re. $26,037) 5 Equipment ... 10,000 .................................... (re. $6,264) 6 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2021: 7 PERSONAL SERVICE 8 Personal service-regular ... 5,945,236 .............. (re. $1,800,000) 9 Temporary service ... 120,770 .......................... (re. $90,000) 10 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 11 Supplies and materials ... 279,400 ..................... (re. $66,937) 12 Travel ... 5,000 ........................................ (re. $5,000) 13 Contractual services ... 140,000 ....................... (re. $28,705) 14 Equipment ... 10,000 .................................... (re. $9,500) 15 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2020: 16 PERSONAL SERVICE 17 Personal service-regular ... 5,817,777 ................ (re. $595,000) 18 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 19 Supplies and materials ... 279,400 .................... (re. $190,000) 20 Travel ... 5,000 ........................................ (re. $5,000) 21 Contractual services ... 140,000 ....................... (re. $49,244) 22 Equipment ... 10,000 .................................... (re. $9,000) 23 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2012: 24 PERSONAL SERVICE 25 Temporary service ... 159,000 .......................... (re. $30,000) 26 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 27 Travel ... 29,000 ...................................... (re. $29,000) 28 Equipment ... 49,000 ................................... (re. $46,000) 29 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2011: 30 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 31 Travel ... 29,000 ...................................... (re. $29,000) 32 Equipment ... 49,000 .................................... (re. $9,000) 33 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2010: 43 12551-02-5 LEGISLATURE AND JUDICIARY 2025-26 1 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 2 Travel ... 29,000 ...................................... (re. $28,621) 3 Equipment ... 49,000 ................................... (re. $47,816) 4 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2009: 5 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 6 Travel ... 30,000 ...................................... (re. $12,589) 7 Equipment ... 50,000 ................................... (re. $26,127) 8 SENATE AND ASSEMBLY JOINT ENTITIES 9 LEGISLATIVE ETHICS COMMISSION 10 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 11 For services and expenses of the Legislative Ethics Commission. 12 PERSONAL SERVICE 13 Personal service-regular ... 452,499 .................. (re. $205,270) 14 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 15 Supplies and materials ... 6,667 ........................ (re. $6,667) 16 Travel ... 6,000 ........................................ (re. $4,500) 17 Contractual services ... 2,000 .......................... (re. $2,000) 18 Equipment ... 1,000 ..................................... (re. $1,000) 19 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 20 For services and expenses of the Legislative Ethics Commission. 21 PERSONAL SERVICE 22 Personal service-regular ... 434,493 ................... (re. $74,704) 23 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 24 Supplies and materials ... 6,667 ........................ (re. $6,667) 25 Travel ... 6,000 .......................................... (re. $100) 26 Contractual services ... 2,000 .......................... (re. $1,640) 27 Equipment ... 1,000 ..................................... (re. $1,000) 28 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2022: 29 For services and expenses of the Legislative Ethics Commission. 30 PERSONAL SERVICE 31 Personal service-regular ... 421,382 .................. (re. $180,277) 32 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 33 Supplies and materials ... 6,667 ........................ (re. $6,667) 34 Contractual services ... 2,000 .......................... (re. $2,000) 44 12551-02-5 LEGISLATURE AND JUDICIARY 2025-26 1 Equipment ... 1,000 ..................................... (re. $1,000) 2 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2021: 3 For services and expenses of the Legislative Ethics Commission. 4 PERSONAL SERVICE 5 Personal service-regular ... 396,354 .................. (re. $159,714) 6 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 7 Supplies and materials ... 6,667 ........................ (re. $6,667) 8 Contractual services ... 2,000 .......................... (re. $2,000) 9 Equipment ... 1,000 ..................................... (re. $1,000) 10 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2020: 11 For services and expenses of the Legislative Ethics Commission. 12 PERSONAL SERVICE 13 Personal service-regular ... 396,354 .................. (re. $119,077) 14 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 15 Supplies and materials ... 6,667 ........................ (re. $6,667) 16 Contractual services ... 2,000 .......................... (re. $2,000) 17 Equipment ... 1,000 ..................................... (re. $1,000) 18 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2019: 19 For services and expenses of the Legislative Ethics Commission. 20 PERSONAL SERVICE 21 Personal service-regular ... 388,275 ................... (re. $73,821) 22 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 23 Supplies and materials ... 6,667 ........................ (re. $6,667) 24 Contractual services ... 2,000 ............................ (re. $100) 25 Equipment ... 1,000 ..................................... (re. $1,000) 26 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2018: 27 For services and expenses of the Legislative Ethics Commission. 28 PERSONAL SERVICE 29 Personal service-regular ... 380,355 ................... (re. $78,299) 30 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 31 Supplies and materials ... 6,667 ........................ (re. $6,522) 32 Contractual services ... 2,000 .......................... (re. $2,000) 33 Equipment ... 1,000 ..................................... (re. $1,000) 45 12551-02-5 LEGISLATURE AND JUDICIARY 2025-26 1 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2017: 2 For services and expenses of the Legislative Ethics Commission. 3 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 4 Supplies and materials ... 6,667 ........................ (re. $6,219) 5 Contractual services ... 2,000 ............................ (re. $747) 6 Equipment ... 1,000 ..................................... (re. $1,000) 7 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2016: 8 For services and expenses of the Legislative Ethics Commission. 9 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 10 Supplies and materials ... 6,667 ........................ (re. $6,667) 11 Contractual services ... 2,000 ............................ (re. $100) 12 Equipment ... 1,000 ..................................... (re. $1,000) 13 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2015: 14 For services and expenses of the Legislative Ethics Commission. 15 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 16 Supplies and materials ... 6,667 ........................ (re. $6,667) 17 Contractual services ... 2,000 ............................. (re. $13) 18 Equipment ... 1,000 ..................................... (re. $1,000) 19 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2014: 20 For services and expenses of the Legislative Ethics Commission. 21 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 22 Supplies and materials ... 6,667 .......................... (re. $262) 23 Equipment ... 1,000 ..................................... (re. $1,000) 24 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2013: 25 For services and expenses of the Legislative Ethics Commission. 26 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 27 Equipment ... 1,000 ..................................... (re. $1,000) 28 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2012: 29 For services and expenses of the Legislative Ethics Commission. 30 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 31 Equipment ... 1,000 ..................................... (re. $1,000) 32 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2011: 33 For services and expenses of the Legislative Ethics Commission. 46 12551-02-5 LEGISLATURE AND JUDICIARY 2025-26 1 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 2 Equipment ... 1,000 ..................................... (re. $1,000) 3 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2010: 4 For services and expenses of the Legislative Ethics Commission. 5 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 6 Equipment ... 1,000 ....................................... (re. $312) 7 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2008: 8 For services and expenses of the Legislative Ethics Commission. 9 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 10 Equipment ... 1,000 ....................................... (re. $903) 11 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2006: 12 For services and expenses of the Legislative Ethics Committee ... .. 13 358,900 ............................................. (re. $138,068) 14 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2005: 15 For services and expenses of the Legislative Ethics Committee ... .. 16 358,900 .............................................. (re. $39,224) 17 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2004: 18 For services and expenses of the Legislative Ethics Committee ... .. 19 358,900 ............................................. (re. $176,455) 20 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2003: 21 For services and expenses of the Legislative Ethics Committee ... .. 22 358,900 ............................................. (re. $160,441) 23 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2002: 24 For services and expenses of the Legislative Ethics Committee ... .. 25 370,000 ............................................. (re. $171,793) 26 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2001: 27 For services and expenses of the Legislative Ethics Committee ... .. 28 370,000 ............................................. (re. $179,853) 29 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2000: 30 For services and expenses of the Legislative Ethics Committee ... .. 31 370,000 ............................................. (re. $259,141) 32 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 1999: 33 For services and expenses of the Legislative Ethics Committee ... .. 34 370,000 ............................................. (re. $226,467) 35 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 1998: 36 For services and expenses of the Legislative Ethics Committee ... .. 37 370,000 ............................................. (re. $257,387) 47 12551-02-5 LEGISLATURE AND JUDICIARY 2025-26 1 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 1997: 2 For services and expenses of the Legislative Ethics Committee ... .. 3 370,000 ............................................. (re. $223,096) 4 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 1996: 5 For services and expenses of the Legislative Ethics Committee ... .. 6 370,000 ............................................. (re. $121,736) 7 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 1995: 8 For services and expenses of the Legislative Ethics Committee ... .. 9 370,000 ............................................. (re. $126,518) 10 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 1994: 11 For services and expenses of the Legislative Ethics Committee ... .. 12 370,000 ............................................... (re. $7,895) 13 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 1993: 14 For services and expenses of the Legislative Ethics Committee ... .. 15 370,000 ............................................. (re. $257,753) 16 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 1992: 17 For services and expenses of the Legislative Ethics Committee ... .. 18 370,000 ............................................. (re. $339,513) 19 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 1991: 20 For services and expenses of the Legislative Ethics Committee ... .. 21 410,000 ............................................. (re. $112,640) 22 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 1990: 23 For services and expenses of the Legislative Ethics Committee ... .. 24 500,000 ............................................. (re. $190,724) 25 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 1989: 26 For services and expenses of the Legislative Ethics Committee ... .. 27 1,000,000 ........................................... (re. $176,562) 28 LEGISLATIVE HEALTH SERVICE 29 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 30 For services and expenses for the operation of the legislative health 31 service. 32 PERSONAL SERVICE 33 Personal service-regular ... 234,691 .................. (re. $115,653) 34 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 35 Supplies and materials ... 25,700 ...................... (re. $25,700) 36 Contractual services ... 1,000 .......................... (re. $1,000) 37 Equipment ... 1,000 ..................................... (re. $1,000) 38 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 48 12551-02-5 LEGISLATURE AND JUDICIARY 2025-26 1 For services and expenses for the operation of the legislative health 2 service. 3 PERSONAL SERVICE 4 Personal service-regular ... 224,599 ................... (re. $34,887) 5 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 6 Supplies and materials ... 25,700 ...................... (re. $25,700) 7 Contractual services ... 1,000 .......................... (re. $1,000) 8 Equipment ... 1,000 ..................................... (re. $1,000) 9 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2022: 10 For services and expenses for the operation of the legislative health 11 service. 12 PERSONAL SERVICE 13 Personal service-regular ... 217,250 ................... (re. $26,422) 14 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 15 Supplies and materials ... 25,700 ...................... (re. $25,700) 16 Contractual services ... 1,000 ............................ (re. $994) 17 Equipment ... 1,000 ..................................... (re. $1,000) 18 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2021: 19 For services and expenses for the operation of the legislative health 20 service. 21 PERSONAL SERVICE 22 Personal service-regular ... 203,223 ................... (re. $40,765) 23 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 24 Contractual services ... 1,000 .......................... (re. $1,000) 25 Equipment ... 1,000 ..................................... (re. $1,000) 26 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2020: 27 For services and expenses for the operation of the legislative health 28 service. 29 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 30 Supplies and materials ... 25,700 ...................... (re. $25,700) 31 Contractual services ... 1,000 ............................ (re. $999) 32 Equipment ... 1,000 ..................................... (re. $1,000) 33 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2019: 34 For services and expenses for the operation of the legislative health 35 service. 49 12551-02-5 LEGISLATURE AND JUDICIARY 2025-26 1 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 2 Supplies and materials ... 25,700 ....................... (re. $8,771) 3 Equipment ... 1,000 ..................................... (re. $1,000) 4 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2018: 5 For services and expenses for the operation of the legislative health 6 service. 7 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 8 Equipment ... 1,000 ..................................... (re. $1,000) 9 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2017: 10 For services and expenses for the operation of the legislative health 11 service. 12 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 13 Equipment ... 1,000 ..................................... (re. $1,000) 14 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2016: 15 For services and expenses for the operation of the legislative health 16 service. 17 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 18 Equipment ... 1,000 ..................................... (re. $1,000) 19 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2015: 20 For services and expenses for the operation of the legislative health 21 service. 22 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 23 Equipment ... 1,000 ..................................... (re. $1,000) 24 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2014: 25 For services and expenses for the operation of the legislative health 26 service. 27 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 28 Equipment ... 1,000 ..................................... (re. $1,000) 29 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2013: 30 For services and expenses for the operation of the legislative health 31 service. 32 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 33 Equipment ... 1,000 ....................................... (re. $826) 34 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2012: 50 12551-02-5 LEGISLATURE AND JUDICIARY 2025-26 1 For services and expenses for the operation of the legislative health 2 service. 3 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 4 Equipment ... 1,000 ....................................... (re. $805) 5 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2011: 6 For services and expenses for the operation of the legislative health 7 service. 8 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 9 Equipment ... 1,000 ..................................... (re. $1,000) 10 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2010: 11 For services and expenses for the operation of the legislative health 12 service. 13 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 14 Equipment ... 1,000 ..................................... (re. $1,000) 15 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2009: 16 For services and expenses for the operation of the legislative health 17 service. 18 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 19 Equipment ... 1,000 ....................................... (re. $356) 20 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2008: 21 For services and expenses for the operation of the legislative health 22 service. 23 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 24 Equipment ... 1,000 ....................................... (re. $581) 25 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2007: 26 For services and expenses for the operation of the legislative health 27 service. 28 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 29 Equipment ... 1,000 ....................................... (re. $923) 30 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2003: 31 For services and expenses ... ... 178,838 ............ (re. $16,975) 32 LEGISLATIVE LIBRARY 33 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 51 12551-02-5 LEGISLATURE AND JUDICIARY 2025-26 1 For services and expenses for the operation of the legislative 2 library. 3 PERSONAL SERVICE 4 Personal service-regular ... 612,386 .................. (re. $379,037) 5 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 6 Supplies and materials ... 126,500 .................... (re. $126,500) 7 Contractual services ... 247,500 ...................... (re. $224,826) 8 Equipment ... 5,000 ..................................... (re. $5,000) 9 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 10 For services and expenses for the operation of the legislative 11 library. 12 PERSONAL SERVICE 13 Personal service-regular ... 574,256 .................. (re. $245,056) 14 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 15 Supplies and materials ... 126,500 .................... (re. $126,500) 16 Equipment ... 5,000 ..................................... (re. $3,150) 17 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2022: 18 For services and expenses for the operation of the legislative 19 library. 20 PERSONAL SERVICE 21 Personal service-regular ... 546,491 .................. (re. $325,381) 22 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 23 Supplies and materials ... 126,500 .................... (re. $112,983) 24 Equipment ... 5,000 ..................................... (re. $5,000) 25 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2021: 26 For services and expenses for the operation of the legislative 27 library. 28 PERSONAL SERVICE 29 Personal service-regular ... 493,491 .................. (re. $249,712) 30 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 31 Supplies and materials ... 247,500 .................... (re. $247,337) 32 Equipment ... 5,000 ..................................... (re. $5,000) 33 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2020: 52 12551-02-5 LEGISLATURE AND JUDICIARY 2025-26 1 For services and expenses for the operation of the legislative 2 library. 3 PERSONAL SERVICE 4 Personal service-regular ... 493,491 .................. (re. $189,649) 5 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 6 Supplies and materials ... 247,500 .................... (re. $247,500) 7 Equipment ... 5,000 ..................................... (re. $5,000) 8 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2019: 9 For services and expenses for the operation of the legislative 10 library. 11 PERSONAL SERVICE 12 Personal service-regular ... 476,383 ................... (re. $66,837) 13 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 14 Supplies and materials ... 247,500 .................... (re. $106,869) 15 Equipment ... 5,000 ..................................... (re. $5,000) 16 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2018: 17 For services and expenses for the operation of the legislative 18 library. 19 PERSONAL SERVICE 20 Personal service-regular ... 459,611 ................... (re. $27,422) 21 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 22 Supplies and materials ... 247,500 ..................... (re. $98,757) 23 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2017: 24 For services and expenses for the operation of the legislative 25 library. 26 PERSONAL SERVICE 27 Personal service-regular ... 443,168 ................... (re. $25,811) 28 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2016: 29 For services and expenses for the operation of the legislative 30 library. 31 PERSONAL SERVICE 32 Personal service-regular ... 419,221 ................... (re. $11,776) 33 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2015: 53 12551-02-5 LEGISLATURE AND JUDICIARY 2025-26 1 For services and expenses for the operation of the legislative 2 library. 3 PERSONAL SERVICE 4 Personal service-regular ... 419,221 ................... (re. $31,994) 5 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2014: 6 For services and expenses for the operation of the legislative 7 library. 8 PERSONAL SERVICE 9 Personal service-regular ... 419,221 ................... (re. $53,702) 10 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2013: 11 For services and expenses for the operation of the legislative 12 library. 13 PERSONAL SERVICE 14 Personal service-regular ... 419,221 .................. (re. $156,326) 15 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 16 Equipment ... 5,000 ..................................... (re. $5,000) 17 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2012: 18 For services and expenses for the operation of the legislative 19 library. 20 PERSONAL SERVICE 21 Personal service-regular ... 419,221 ................... (re. $93,699) 22 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 23 Equipment ... 25,000 ................................... (re. $18,218) 24 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2011: 25 For services and expenses for the operation of the legislative 26 library. 27 PERSONAL SERVICE 28 Personal service-regular ... 419,221 ................... (re. $71,005) 29 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 30 Equipment ... 32,500 ................................... (re. $32,500) 31 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2010: 32 For services and expenses for the operation of the legislative 33 library. 54 12551-02-5 LEGISLATURE AND JUDICIARY 2025-26 1 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 2 Equipment ... 32,500 ................................... (re. $32,500) 3 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2009: 4 For services and expenses for the operation of the legislative 5 library. 6 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 7 Equipment ... 32,800 ................................... (re. $32,800) 8 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2008: 9 For services and expenses for the operation of the legislative 10 library. 11 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 12 Equipment ... 32,800 ................................... (re. $32,800) 13 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2007: 14 For services and expenses for the operation of the legislative 15 library. 16 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 17 Equipment ... 32,800 ................................... (re. $32,800) 18 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 1999: 19 For services and expenses and for temporary and special services 20 ... ..... 712,635 ................................. (re. $605,956) 21 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 1998: 22 For services and expenses and for temporary and special services 23 ... ..... 691,879 ..................................... (re. $200) 24 LEGISLATIVE MESSENGER SERVICE 25 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 26 For services and expenses for the operation of the legislative messen- 27 ger service. 28 PERSONAL SERVICE 29 Personal service-regular ... 1,125,519 ................ (re. $449,273) 30 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 31 Supplies and materials ... 2,000 ........................ (re. $2,000) 32 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 55 12551-02-5 LEGISLATURE AND JUDICIARY 2025-26 1 For services and expenses for the operation of the legislative messen- 2 ger service. 3 PERSONAL SERVICE 4 Personal service-regular ... 1,082,153 ................ (re. $153,251) 5 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 6 Supplies and materials ... 2,000 ........................ (re. $2,000) 7 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2022: 8 For services and expenses for the operation of the legislative messen- 9 ger service. 10 PERSONAL SERVICE 11 Personal service-regular ... 1,050,576 ................. (re. $98,999) 12 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 13 Supplies and materials ... 2,000 ........................ (re. $2,000) 14 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2021: 15 For services and expenses for the operation of the legislative messen- 16 ger service. 17 PERSONAL SERVICE 18 Personal service-regular ... 990,298 .................. (re. $104,699) 19 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 20 Supplies and materials ... 2,000 ........................ (re. $2,000) 21 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2020: 22 For services and expenses for the operation of the legislative messen- 23 ger service. 24 PERSONAL SERVICE 25 Personal service-regular ... 990,298 ................... (re. $77,886) 26 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 27 Supplies and materials ... 2,000 ........................ (re. $1,429) 28 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2019: 29 For services and expenses for the operation of the legislative messen- 30 ger service. 31 PERSONAL SERVICE 32 Personal service-regular ... 970,841 ................... (re. $48,368) 56 12551-02-5 LEGISLATURE AND JUDICIARY 2025-26 1 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 2 Supplies and materials ... 2,000 ........................ (re. $2,000) 3 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2018: 4 For services and expenses for the operation of the legislative messen- 5 ger service. 6 PERSONAL SERVICE 7 Personal service-regular ... 951,766 .................... (re. $7,383) 8 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 9 Supplies and materials ... 2,000 ........................ (re. $1,333) 10 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2017: 11 For services and expenses for the operation of the legislative messen- 12 ger service. 13 PERSONAL SERVICE 14 Personal service-regular ... 933,065 ................... (re. $24,219) 15 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 16 Supplies and materials ... 2,000 ........................ (re. $1,907) 17 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2016: 18 For services and expenses for the operation of the legislative messen- 19 ger service. 20 PERSONAL SERVICE 21 Personal service-regular ... 905,830 .................... (re. $9,648) 22 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 23 Supplies and materials ... 2,000 ........................ (re. $2,000) 24 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2015: 25 For services and expenses for the operation of the legislative messen- 26 ger service. 27 PERSONAL SERVICE 28 Personal service-regular ... 905,830 ................... (re. $54,892) 29 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 30 Supplies and materials ... 2,000 ........................ (re. $2,000) 31 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2014: 57 12551-02-5 LEGISLATURE AND JUDICIARY 2025-26 1 For services and expenses for the operation of the legislative messen- 2 ger service. 3 PERSONAL SERVICE 4 Personal service-regular ... 905,830 ................... (re. $88,407) 5 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 6 Supplies and materials ... 2,000 .......................... (re. $361) 7 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2013: 8 For services and expenses for the operation of the legislative messen- 9 ger service. 10 PERSONAL SERVICE 11 Personal service-regular ... 905,830 .................. (re. $105,573) 12 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2012: 13 For services and expenses for the operation of the legislative messen- 14 ger service. 15 PERSONAL SERVICE 16 Personal service-regular ... 905,830 .................. (re. $141,698) 17 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2011: 18 For services and expenses for the operation of the legislative messen- 19 ger service. 20 PERSONAL SERVICE 21 Personal service-regular ... 905,830 ................... (re. $71,825) 22 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 23 Supplies and materials ... 2,000 .......................... (re. $113) 24 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2010: 25 For services and expenses for the operation of the legislative messen- 26 ger service. 27 PERSONAL SERVICE 28 Personal service-regular ... 905,830 ................... (re. $44,703) 29 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2009: 30 For services and expenses for the operation of the legislative messen- 31 ger service. 32 PERSONAL SERVICE 33 Personal service-regular ... 905,000 ................... (re. $37,839) 58 12551-02-5 LEGISLATURE AND JUDICIARY 2025-26 1 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2008: 2 For services and expenses for the operation of the legislative messen- 3 ger service. 4 PERSONAL SERVICE 5 Personal service-regular ... 905,000 ................... (re. $28,486) 6 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2007: 7 For services and expenses for the operation of the legislative messen- 8 ger service. 9 PERSONAL SERVICE 10 Personal service-regular ... 850,000 ................... (re. $64,837) 11 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 12 Supplies and materials ... 6,106 ........................ (re. $4,476) 13 Equipment ... 1,000 ....................................... (re. $422) 14 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2006: 15 For services and expenses ... ... 841,850 ............ (re. $18,351) 16 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2005: 17 For services and expenses ... ... 817,330 ............ (re. $22,465) 18 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2003: 19 For services and expenses ... ... 688,524 ........... (re. $274,909) 20 LEGISLATIVE BILL DRAFTING COMMISSION 21 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 22 For services and expenses, temporary and special services, and for 23 expenses of maintenance and operation, including travel outside of 24 the state. 25 PERSONAL SERVICE 26 Personal service-regular ... 13,856,904 ............. (re. $4,373,319) 27 Temporary service ... 169,240 ......................... (re. $169,240) 28 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 29 Supplies and materials ... 332,021 .................... (re. $324,106) 30 Travel ... 50,577 ...................................... (re. $50,577) 31 Contractual services ... 4,710,163 .................. (re. $4,709,422) 32 Equipment ... 158,793 ................................. (re. $158,793) 33 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 34 For services and expenses, temporary and special services, and for 35 expenses of maintenance and operation, including travel outside of 36 the state. 59 12551-02-5 LEGISLATURE AND JUDICIARY 2025-26 1 PERSONAL SERVICE 2 Personal service-regular ... 13,115,454 ............... (re. $675,812) 3 Temporary service ... 169,240 ......................... (re. $169,240) 4 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 5 Supplies and materials ... 332,021 .................... (re. $319,098) 6 Travel ... 50,577 ...................................... (re. $50,577) 7 Contractual services ... 4,710,163 .................. (re. $4,708,778) 8 Equipment ... 158,793 ................................. (re. $158,749) 9 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2022: 10 For services and expenses, temporary and special services, and for 11 expenses of maintenance and operation, including travel outside of 12 the state. 13 PERSONAL SERVICE 14 Personal service-regular ... 12,662,942 ............... (re. $997,464) 15 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 16 Supplies and materials ... 332,021 .................... (re. $312,778) 17 Travel ... 50,577 ...................................... (re. $50,560) 18 Contractual services ... 1,710,163 .................. (re. $1,710,004) 19 Equipment ... 158,793 ................................. (re. $158,793) 20 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2021: 21 For services and expenses, temporary and special services, and for 22 expenses of maintenance and operation, including travel outside of 23 the state. 24 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 25 Supplies and materials ... 332,021 .................... (re. $296,353) 26 Travel ... 50,577 ...................................... (re. $41,849) 27 Contractual services ... 1,710,163 .................. (re. $1,382,580) 28 Equipment ... 158,793 .................................. (re. $49,157) 29 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2020: 30 For services and expenses, temporary and special services, and for 31 expenses of maintenance and operation, including travel outside of 32 the state. 33 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 34 Supplies and materials ... 332,021 .................... (re. $329,810) 35 Contractual services ... 1,710,163 .................. (re. $1,710,163) 36 Equipment ... 158,793 .................................. (re. $97,927) 37 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2019: 60 12551-02-5 LEGISLATURE AND JUDICIARY 2025-26 1 For services and expenses, temporary and special services, and for 2 expenses of maintenance and operation, including travel outside of 3 the state. 4 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 5 Supplies and materials ... 332,021 .................... (re. $110,372) 6 Contractual services ... 1,710,163 .................. (re. $1,635,057) 7 Equipment ... 158,793 ................................. (re. $150,272) 8 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2018: 9 For services and expenses, temporary and special services, and for 10 expenses of maintenance and operation, including travel outside of 11 the state. 12 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 13 Contractual services ... 1,710,163 .................... (re. $760,583) 14 Equipment ... 158,793 ................................. (re. $117,630) 15 LEGISLATIVE TASK FORCE ON DEMOGRAPHIC RESEARCH AND REAPPORTIONMENT 16 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 17 For services and expenses ... ... of the task force for senate 18 purposes. 19 PERSONAL SERVICE 20 Personal service-regular ... 434,636 .................. (re. $243,377) 21 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 22 Travel ... 3,000 ........................................ (re. $3,000) 23 Contractual services ... 7,402 .......................... (re. $7,402) 24 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 25 For services and expenses ... ... of the task force for assembly 26 purposes. 27 PERSONAL SERVICE 28 Personal service - regular ... 429,580 ................ (re. $327,138) 29 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 30 Supplies and materials ... 1,000 ........................ (re. $1,000) 31 Travel ... 1,000 .......................................... (re. $507) 32 Contractual services ... 9,200 .......................... (re. $9,163) 33 For services and expenses ... ... of the task force for joint oper- 34 ations. 61 12551-02-5 LEGISLATURE AND JUDICIARY 2025-26 1 PERSONAL SERVICE 2 Personal service - regular ... 1,068,925 .............. (re. $441,943) 3 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 4 Supplies and materials ... 17,000 ...................... (re. $10,063) 5 Travel ... 5,000 ........................................ (re. $4,221) 6 Contractual services ... 106,000 ....................... (re. $63,413) 7 Equipment ... 208,000 ................................. (re. $178,182) 8 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 9 For services and expenses ... ... of the task force for senate 10 purposes. 11 PERSONAL SERVICE 12 Personal service-regular ... 417,519 .................. (re. $156,371) 13 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 14 Travel ... 3,000 ........................................ (re. $3,000) 15 Contractual services ... 7,402 .......................... (re. $7,402) 16 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 17 For services and expenses ... ... of the task force for assembly 18 purposes. 19 PERSONAL SERVICE 20 Personal service - regular ... 412,627 ................ (re. $297,221) 21 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 22 Supplies and materials ... 1,000 .......................... (re. $238) 23 Travel ... 1,000 .......................................... (re. $484) 24 Contractual services ... 9,200 .......................... (re. $9,185) 25 For services and expenses ... ... of the task force for joint oper- 26 ations. 27 PERSONAL SERVICE 28 Personal service - regular ... 1,014,889 .............. (re. $128,808) 29 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 30 Supplies and materials ... 17,000 ...................... (re. $13,849) 31 Travel ... 5,000 ........................................ (re. $3,975) 32 Contractual services ... 106,000 ....................... (re. $65,068) 33 Equipment ... 208,000 ................................. (re. $207,436) 34 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2022: 62 12551-02-5 LEGISLATURE AND JUDICIARY 2025-26 1 For services and expenses ... ... of the task force for senate 2 purposes. 3 PERSONAL SERVICE 4 Personal service-regular ... 405,055 .................. (re. $155,795) 5 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 6 Travel ... 3,000 ........................................ (re. $3,000) 7 Contractual services ... 7,402 .......................... (re. $7,402) 8 For services and expenses ... ... of the task force for assembly 9 purposes. 10 PERSONAL SERVICE 11 Personal service-regular ... 400,283 .................. (re. $302,378) 12 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 13 Supplies and materials ... 1,000 ........................ (re. $1,000) 14 Travel ... 1,000 ........................................ (re. $1,000) 15 Contractual services ... 9,200 .......................... (re. $9,200) 16 For services and expenses ... ... of the task force for joint oper- 17 ations. 18 PERSONAL SERVICE 19 Personal service-regular ... 975,543 .................. (re. $116,212) 20 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 21 Supplies and materials ... 17,000 ....................... (re. $8,295) 22 Travel ... 5,000 ........................................ (re. $4,532) 23 Contractual services ... 106,000 ....................... (re. $66,132) 24 Equipment ... 208,000 ................................. (re. $206,057) 25 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2021: 26 For services and expenses ... ... of the task force for senate 27 purposes. 28 PERSONAL SERVICE 29 Personal service-regular ... 381,263 .................. (re. $139,836) 30 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 31 Travel ... 3,000 ........................................ (re. $3,000) 32 Contractual services ... 7,402 .......................... (re. $7,402) 33 For services and expenses ... ... of the task force for assembly 34 purposes. 63 12551-02-5 LEGISLATURE AND JUDICIARY 2025-26 1 PERSONAL SERVICE 2 Personal service-regular ... 388,298 .................. (re. $272,533) 3 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 4 Supplies and materials ... 1,000 ........................ (re. $1,000) 5 Travel ... 1,000 ........................................ (re. $1,000) 6 Contractual services ... 9,200 .......................... (re. $9,200) 7 For services and expenses ... ... of the task force for joint oper- 8 ations. 9 PERSONAL SERVICE 10 Personal service-regular ... 937,343 .................. (re. $162,592) 11 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 12 Supplies and materials ... 17,000 ...................... (re. $15,040) 13 Travel ... 5,000 ........................................ (re. $5,000) 14 Contractual services ... 106,000 ....................... (re. $74,789) 15 Equipment ... 208,000 ................................. (re. $203,996) 16 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2020: 17 For services and expenses ... ... of the task force for senate 18 purposes. 19 PERSONAL SERVICE 20 Personal service-regular ... 381,263 .................. (re. $129,754) 21 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 22 Travel ... 3,000 ........................................ (re. $3,000) 23 Contractual services ... 7,402 .......................... (re. $7,402) 24 For services and expenses ... ... of the task force for assembly 25 purposes. 26 PERSONAL SERVICE 27 Personal service-regular ... 380,465 .................. (re. $272,911) 28 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 29 Supplies and materials ... 1,000 ........................ (re. $1,000) 30 Travel ... 1,000 ........................................ (re. $1,000) 31 Contractual services ... 9,200 .......................... (re. $3,905) 32 For services and expenses ... ... of the task force for joint oper- 33 ations. 64 12551-02-5 LEGISLATURE AND JUDICIARY 2025-26 1 PERSONAL SERVICE 2 Personal service-regular ... 912,375 .................. (re. $253,261) 3 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 4 Supplies and materials ... 17,000 ...................... (re. $12,815) 5 Travel ... 5,000 ........................................ (re. $5,000) 6 Contractual services ... 106,000 ....................... (re. $73,501) 7 Equipment ... 208,000 ................................. (re. $205,639) 8 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2019: 9 For services and expenses ... ... of the task force for senate 10 purposes. 11 PERSONAL SERVICE 12 Personal service-regular ... 373,583 .................. (re. $284,572) 13 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 14 Travel ... 3,000 ........................................ (re. $3,000) 15 Contractual services ... 7,402 .......................... (re. $7,402) 16 For services and expenses ... ... of the task force for Assembly 17 purposes. 18 PERSONAL SERVICE 19 Personal service - regular ... 372,785 ................ (re. $280,548) 20 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 21 Supplies and materials ... 1,000 ........................ (re. $1,000) 22 Travel ... 1,000 ........................................ (re. $1,000) 23 Contractual services ... 9,200 .......................... (re. $9,200) 24 For services and expenses ... ... of the task force for joint oper- 25 ations. 26 PERSONAL SERVICE 27 Personal service - regular ... 887,898 ................ (re. $170,474) 28 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 29 Supplies and materials ... 17,000 ...................... (re. $17,000) 30 Travel ... 5,000 ........................................ (re. $5,000) 31 Contractual services ... 106,000 ...................... (re. $105,922) 32 Equipment ... 208,000 ................................. (re. $206,497) 33 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2018: 34 For services and expenses ... ... of the task force for senate 35 purposes. 65 12551-02-5 LEGISLATURE AND JUDICIARY 2025-26 1 PERSONAL SERVICE 2 Personal service-regular ... 366,054 ................... (re. $37,446) 3 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 4 Travel ... 3,000 ........................................ (re. $3,000) 5 Contractual services ... 7,402 .......................... (re. $7,402) 6 For services and expenses ... ... of the task force for Assembly 7 purposes. 8 PERSONAL SERVICE 9 Personal service - regular ... 365,256 ................ (re. $279,205) 10 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 11 Supplies and materials ... 1,000 ........................ (re. $1,000) 12 Travel ... 1,000 ........................................ (re. $1,000) 13 Contractual services ... 9,200 .......................... (re. $9,200) 14 For services and expenses ... ... of the task force for joint oper- 15 ations. 16 PERSONAL SERVICE 17 Personal service - regular ... 863,900 ................ (re. $170,654) 18 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 19 Supplies and materials ... 17,000 ...................... (re. $17,000) 20 Travel ... 5,000 ........................................ (re. $5,000) 21 Contractual services ... 106,000 ...................... (re. $105,982) 22 Equipment ... 208,000 ................................. (re. $208,000) 23 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2017: 24 For services and expenses ... ... of the task force for senate 25 purposes. 26 PERSONAL SERVICE 27 Personal service-regular ... 358,673 ................... (re. $22,060) 28 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 29 Travel ... 3,000 ........................................ (re. $3,000) 30 Contractual services ... 7,402 .......................... (re. $7,402) 31 For services and expenses ... ... of the task force for Assembly 32 purposes. 66 12551-02-5 LEGISLATURE AND JUDICIARY 2025-26 1 PERSONAL SERVICE 2 Personal service - regular ... 348,875 ................ (re. $268,022) 3 Temporary service ... 9,000 ............................. (re. $9,000) 4 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 5 Supplies and materials ... 1,000 ........................ (re. $1,000) 6 Travel ... 1,000 ........................................ (re. $1,000) 7 Contractual services ... 9,200 .......................... (re. $8,450) 8 For services and expenses ... ... of the task force for joint oper- 9 ations. 10 PERSONAL SERVICE 11 Personal service - regular ... 831,372 ................. (re. $85,694) 12 Temporary service ... 9,000 ............................. (re. $9,000) 13 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 14 Supplies and materials ... 17,000 ...................... (re. $17,000) 15 Travel ... 5,000 ........................................ (re. $5,000) 16 Contractual services ... 106,000 ...................... (re. $105,967) 17 Equipment ... 208,000 ................................. (re. $208,000) 18 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2016: 19 For services and expenses ... ... of the task force for senate 20 purposes. 21 PERSONAL SERVICE 22 Personal service-regular ... 347,923 ................... (re. $21,988) 23 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 24 Travel ... 3,000 ........................................ (re. $3,000) 25 Contractual services ... 7,402 .......................... (re. $7,402) 26 For services and expenses ... ... of the task force for assembly 27 purposes. 28 PERSONAL SERVICE 29 Personal service-regular ... 338,125 .................. (re. $244,319) 30 Temporary service ... 9,000 ............................. (re. $9,000) 31 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 32 Supplies and materials ... 1,000 ........................ (re. $1,000) 33 Travel ... 1,000 ........................................ (re. $1,000) 34 Contractual services ... 9,200 .......................... (re. $9,200) 67 12551-02-5 LEGISLATURE AND JUDICIARY 2025-26 1 For services and expenses ... ... of the task force for 2 joint operations. 3 PERSONAL SERVICE 4 Personal service-regular ... 797,109 .................. (re. $236,703) 5 Temporary service ... 9,000 ............................. (re. $9,000) 6 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 7 Supplies and materials ... 17,000 ...................... (re. $17,000) 8 Travel ... 5,000 ........................................ (re. $5,000) 9 Contractual services ... 106,000 ...................... (re. $104,386) 10 Equipment ... 208,000 ................................. (re. $208,000) 11 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2015: 12 For services and expenses ... ... of the task force for senate 13 purposes. 14 PERSONAL SERVICE 15 Personal service-regular ... 347,923 .................... (re. $9,254) 16 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 17 Travel ... 3,000 ........................................ (re. $1,386) 18 Contractual services ... 7,402 .......................... (re. $7,402) 19 For services and expenses ... ... of the task force for Assembly 20 purposes. 21 PERSONAL SERVICE 22 Personal service - regular ... 338,125 ................ (re. $228,676) 23 Temporary service ... 9,000 ............................. (re. $9,000) 24 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 25 Supplies and materials ... 1,000 ........................ (re. $1,000) 26 Travel ... 1,000 ........................................ (re. $1,000) 27 Contractual services ... 9,200 .......................... (re. $9,200) 28 For services and expenses ... ... of the task force for joint oper- 29 ations. 30 PERSONAL SERVICE 31 Personal service - regular ... 797,109 ................. (re. $53,797) 32 Temporary service ... 9,000 ............................. (re. $9,000) 33 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 34 Supplies and materials ... 17,000 ...................... (re. $16,410) 35 Travel ... 5,000 ........................................ (re. $5,000) 36 Contractual services ... 106,000 ...................... (re. $105,395) 68 12551-02-5 LEGISLATURE AND JUDICIARY 2025-26 1 Equipment ... 208,000 ................................. (re. $207,657) 2 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2014: 3 For services and expenses ... ... of the task force for senate 4 purposes. 5 PERSONAL SERVICE 6 Personal service-regular ... 347,923 .................... (re. $9,095) 7 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 8 Travel ... 3,000 ........................................ (re. $3,000) 9 Contractual services ... 7,402 .......................... (re. $5,873) 10 For services and expenses ... ... of the task force for Assembly 11 purposes. 12 PERSONAL SERVICE 13 Personal service-regular ... 338,125 .................. (re. $228,794) 14 Temporary service ... 9,000 ............................. (re. $9,000) 15 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 16 Supplies and materials ... 1,000 ........................ (re. $1,000) 17 Travel ... 1,000 ........................................ (re. $1,000) 18 Contractual services ... 9,200 .......................... (re. $9,200) 19 For services and expenses ... ... of the task force for joint oper- 20 ations. 21 PERSONAL SERVICE 22 Personal service-regular ... 797,109 .................. (re. $735,629) 23 Temporary service ... 9,000 ............................. (re. $9,000) 24 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 25 Supplies and materials ... 17,000 ...................... (re. $16,554) 26 Travel ... 5,000 ........................................ (re. $5,000) 27 Contractual services ... 106,000 ...................... (re. $105,819) 28 Equipment ... 208,000 ................................. (re. $208,000) 29 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2013: 30 For services and expenses ... ... of the task force for senate 31 purposes. 32 PERSONAL SERVICE 33 Personal service-regular ... 347,923 ................... (re. $65,944) 34 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 35 Travel ... 3,000 ........................................ (re. $3,000) 69 12551-02-5 LEGISLATURE AND JUDICIARY 2025-26 1 For services and expenses ... ... of the task force for Assembly 2 purposes. 3 PERSONAL SERVICE 4 Personal service-regular ... 338,125 .................. (re. $219,174) 5 Temporary service ... 9,000 ............................. (re. $9,000) 6 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 7 Supplies and materials ... 1,000 ........................ (re. $1,000) 8 Travel ... 1,000 ........................................ (re. $1,000) 9 Contractual services ... 9,200 .......................... (re. $9,200) 10 For services and expenses ... ... of the task force for joint oper- 11 ations. 12 PERSONAL SERVICE 13 Temporary service ... 9,000 ............................. (re. $9,000) 14 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 15 Supplies and materials ... 17,000 ...................... (re. $16,842) 16 Travel ... 5,000 ........................................ (re. $5,000) 17 Contractual services ... 106,000 ...................... (re. $106,000) 18 Equipment ... 208,000 ................................. (re. $208,000) 19 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2012: 20 For services and expenses ... ... of the task force for senate 21 purposes. 22 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 23 Travel ... 6,000 ....................................... (re. $1,051) 24 For services and expenses ... ... of the task force for assembly 25 purposes. 26 PERSONAL SERVICE 27 Personal service-regular ... 338,125 .................. (re. $208,382) 28 Temporary service ... 9,000 ............................. (re. $9,000) 29 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 30 Supplies and materials ... 1,000 ........................ (re. $1,000) 31 Travel ... 1,000 ........................................ (re. $1,000) 32 Contractual services ... 9,200 .......................... (re. $8,525) 33 For services and expenses ... ... of the task force for joint oper- 34 ations. 70 12551-02-5 LEGISLATURE AND JUDICIARY 2025-26 1 PERSONAL SERVICE 2 Temporary service ... 9,000 ............................. (re. $9,000) 3 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 4 Supplies and materials ... 17,000 ...................... (re. $16,605) 5 Travel ... 5,000 ........................................ (re. $5,000) 6 Contractual services ... 106,000 ...................... (re. $105,948) 7 Equipment ... 208,000 ................................. (re. $208,000) 8 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2011: 9 For services and expenses ... ... of the task force for assembly 10 purposes. 11 PERSONAL SERVICE 12 Personal service-regular ... 338,125 .................. (re. $213,372) 13 Temporary service ... 9,000 ............................. (re. $9,000) 14 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 15 Travel ... 1,000 ........................................ (re. $1,000) 16 Contractual services ... 10,200 ........................ (re. $10,200) 17 For services and expenses ... ... of the task force for joint oper- 18 ations. 19 PERSONAL SERVICE 20 Temporary service ... 9,000 ............................. (re. $9,000) 21 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 22 Supplies and materials ... 14,000 ...................... (re. $13,905) 23 Travel ... 5,000 ........................................ (re. $5,000) 24 Contractual services ... 109,000 ...................... (re. $103,000) 25 Equipment ... 208,000 ................................. (re. $208,000) 26 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2010: 27 For services and expenses ... ... of the task force for assembly 28 purposes. 29 PERSONAL SERVICE 30 Personal service-regular ... 338,125 .................. (re. $208,382) 31 Temporary service ... 9,000 ............................. (re. $9,000) 32 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 33 Travel ... 1,000 ........................................ (re. $1,000) 34 Contractual services ... 10,200 ........................ (re. $10,200) 71 12551-02-5 LEGISLATURE AND JUDICIARY 2025-26 1 For services and expenses ... ... of the task force for joint oper- 2 ations. 3 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 4 Supplies and materials ... 14,000 ......................... (re. $104) 5 Contractual services ... 109,000 ....................... (re. $35,185) 6 Equipment ... 208,000 ................................. (re. $206,855) 7 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2009: 8 For services and expenses ... ... of the task force for assembly 9 purposes. 10 PERSONAL SERVICE 11 Personal service-regular ... 340,542 .................. (re. $210,300) 12 Temporary service ... 10,000 ........................... (re. $10,000) 13 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 14 Travel ... 1,000 ........................................ (re. $1,000) 15 Contractual services ... 10,402 ........................ (re. $10,402) 16 For services and expenses ... ... of the task force for joint oper- 17 ations. 18 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 19 Equipment ... 210,000 ................................. (re. $210,000) 20 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2008: 21 For services and expenses ... ... of the task force for assembly 22 purposes. 23 PERSONAL SERVICE 24 Personal service-regular ... 340,542 .................. (re. $210,300) 25 Temporary service ... 10,000 ........................... (re. $10,000) 26 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 27 Travel ... 1,000 ........................................ (re. $1,000) 28 Contractual services ... 10,402 ......................... (re. $6,082) 29 For services and expenses ... ... of the task force for joint oper- 30 ations. 31 PERSONAL SERVICE 32 Temporary service ... 10,000 ........................... (re. $10,000) 72 12551-02-5 LEGISLATURE AND JUDICIARY 2025-26 1 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 2 Travel ... 5,000 ........................................ (re. $5,000) 3 Equipment ... 210,000 ................................. (re. $209,240) 4 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2007: 5 For services and expenses ... ... of the task force for assembly 6 purposes. 7 PERSONAL SERVICE 8 Personal service-regular ... 330,000 .................. (re. $194,119) 9 Temporary service ... 10,000 ........................... (re. $10,000) 10 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 11 Travel ... 1,000 .......................................... (re. $500) 12 Contractual services ... 10,402 ......................... (re. $7,144) 13 For services and expenses ... ... of the task force for joint oper- 14 ations. 15 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 16 Travel ... 5,000 ........................................ (re. $4,414) 17 Equipment ... 210,000 .................................. (re. $80,677) 18 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2006: 19 For services and expenses ... ... of the task force for assembly 20 purposes ... 341,167 ................................ (re. $177,322) 21 By chapter 51, section 4, of the laws of 2005, as consolidated and reap- 22 propriated: 23 For services and expenses ... ... of the task force for assembly 24 purposes ............................................ (re. $454,200) 25 INDEPENDENT REDISTRICTING COMMISSION 26 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 27 PERSONAL SERVICE 28 Personal service-regular ... 1,200,000 ................ (re. $636,201) 29 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 30 Supplies and materials ... 200,000 .................... (re. $198,652) 31 Travel ... 100,000 ..................................... (re. $98,758) 32 Contractual services ... 2,530,000 .................. (re. $2,472,064) 33 Equipment ... 50,000 ................................... (re. $49,899) 34 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 73 12551-02-5 LEGISLATURE AND JUDICIARY 2025-26 1 PERSONAL SERVICE 2 Personal service-regular ... 1,200,000 ................. (re. $36,170) 3 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 4 Supplies and materials ... 200,000 .................... (re. $198,464) 5 Travel ... 100,000 ..................................... (re. $95,984) 6 Contractual services ... 2,450,000 .................. (re. $1,985,349) 7 Equipment ... 50,000 ................................... (re. $20,228) 8 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2022: 9 PERSONAL SERVICE 10 Personal service-regular ... 500,000 ................... (re. $18,497) 11 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 12 Supplies and materials ... 200,000 .................... (re. $181,019) 13 Travel ... 75,000 ...................................... (re. $50,308) 14 Contractual services ... 1,200,000 .................... (re. $828,028) 15 Equipment ... 25,000 ................................... (re. $11,643) 16 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2021: 17 PERSONAL SERVICE 18 Personal service-regular ... 3,480,000 ................ (re. $652,451) 19 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 20 Supplies and materials ... 200,000 .................... (re. $183,309) 21 Travel ... 200,000 .................................... (re. $181,708) 22 Contractual services ... 60,000 ........................ (re. $60,000) 23 Equipment ... 60,000 ................................... (re. $10,502) 24 COMMISSION ON LONG ISLAND POWER AUTHORITY 25 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 26 PERSONAL SERVICE 27 Personal service-regular ... 750,000 .................. (re. $505,843) 28 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 29 Supplies and materials ... 100,000 ..................... (re. $98,499) 30 Travel ... 100,000 ..................................... (re. $99,681) 31 Contractual services ... 1,000,000 .................... (re. $725,536) 32 Equipment ... 50,000 ................................... (re. $39,738) 33 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2022: 74 12551-02-5 LEGISLATURE AND JUDICIARY 2025-26 1 PERSONAL SERVICE 2 Personal service-regular ... 750,000 .................. (re. $608,562) 3 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 4 Supplies and materials ... 100,000 ..................... (re. $98,551) 5 Travel ... 100,000 .................................... (re. $100,000) 6 Contractual services ... 1,000,000 .................... (re. $371,642) 7 Equipment ... 50,000 ................................... (re. $30,665) 8 MISCELLANEOUS 9 SPECIAL REVENUE FUNDS - OTHER 10 LEGISLATIVE COMPUTER SERVICES FUND 11 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 12 For services and expenses of the Legislative Computer Services Fund. 13 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 14 Contractual services ... 1,000,000 .................. (re. $1,000,000) 15 Equipment ... 500,000 ................................. (re. $500,000) 16 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 17 For services and expenses of the Legislative Computer Services Fund. 18 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 19 Contractual services ... 1,000,000 .................. (re. $1,000,000) 20 Equipment ... 500,000 ................................. (re. $500,000) 21 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2022: 22 For services and expenses of the Legislative Computer Services Fund. 23 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 24 Contractual services ... 1,000,000 .................. (re. $1,000,000) 25 Equipment ... 500,000 ................................. (re. $500,000) 26 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2021: 27 For services and expenses of the Legislative Computer Services Fund. 28 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 29 Contractual services ... 1,000,000 .................. (re. $1,000,000) 30 Equipment ... 500,000 ................................. (re. $500,000) 31 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2020: 32 For services and expenses of the Legislative Computer Services Fund. 75 12551-02-5 LEGISLATURE AND JUDICIARY 2025-26 1 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 2 Contractual services ... 1,000,000 .................... (re. $215,021) 3 Equipment ... 500,000 ................................. (re. $500,000) 4 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2019: 5 For services and expenses of the Legislative Computer Services Fund. 6 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 7 Contractual services ... 1,000,000 .................... (re. $654,993) 8 Equipment ... 500,000 ................................. (re. $500,000) 9 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2018: 10 For services and expenses of the Legislative Computer Services Fund. 11 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 12 Equipment ... 500,000 ................................. (re. $500,000) 13 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2017: 14 For services and expenses of the Legislative Computer Services Fund. 15 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 16 Equipment ... 500,000 ................................. (re. $500,000) 17 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2016: 18 For services and expenses of the Legislative Computer Services Fund. 19 NONPERSONAL SERVICE 20 Equipment ... 500,000 ................................. (re. $416,676) 21 SENATE RECYCLABLE MATERIALS, INFORMATION 22 SERVICES AND CONFERENCE FUND 23 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 24 For services and expenses ... ... 50,000 ............. (re. $50,000) 25 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 26 For services and expenses ... ... 50,000 ............. (re. $50,000) 27 ASSEMBLY RECYCLABLE MATERIALS, INFORMATION 28 SERVICES AND CONFERENCE FUND 29 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2024: 30 For services and expenses ... ... 50,000 ............. (re. $50,000) 31 By chapter 51, section 1, of the laws of 2023: 32 For services and expenses ... ... 50,000 ............. (re. $50,000) 33 § 5. This act shall take effect immediately and shall be deemed to 34 have been in full force and effect on and after April 1, 2025. 76 12551-02-5 LEGISLATURE AND JUDICIARY 2025-26 TABLE OF CONTENTS AGENCY Page Section 1 THE LEGISLATURE ........................................... 1 Assembly .............................................. 3 Assembly Recyclable Materials, Information Services and Conference Fund ......................... 9 Assembly Ways and Means Committee ..................... 4 Computer Services Fund ................................ 9 Grants and Bequests Fund ............................. 10 Joint Entities ........................................ 4 Ethics Commission .................................... 4 National Conference of State Legislatures ............ 5 Health Service ....................................... 5 Library .............................................. 5 Messenger Service .................................... 6 Bill Drafting Commission ............................. 6 Demographic Research and Reapportionment, Task Force on ....................................... 7 Lieutenant Governor, Office of the ................... 1 Senate ................................................ 2 Senate Recyclable Materials, Information Services and Conference Fund ......................... 9 Independent Redistricting Commission .................. 8 Section 2 THE JUDICIARY ............................................ 11 Section 3 THE JUDICIARY - REAPPROPRIATIONS ......................... 25 Section 4 THE LEGISLATURE - REAPPROPRIATIONS ....................... 35 Section 5 EFFECTIVE DATE ........................................... 75